Nebraska, session 109, LB772.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 1-111, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
1-111 (1) All fees collected under the Public Accountancy Act and
all costs collected under subdivision (8) of section 1-148 shall be
remitted by the board to the State Treasurer for credit to the Certified
Public Accountants Fund which is hereby created. Such fund shall, if and
when specifically appropriated by the Legislature during any biennium for
that purpose, be paid out from time to time by the State Treasurer upon
warrants drawn by the Director of Administrative Services on vouchers
approved by the board, and such board and expense thereof shall not be
supported or paid from any other fund of the state. Transfers may be made
from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature
through June 30, 2011. Any money in the Certified Public Accountants Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The board shall remit civil penalties collected under
subdivision (5) of section 1-148 to the State Treasurer for distribution
in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of
Nebraska.
Sec. 2. Section 2-1503.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-1503.01 The Small Watersheds Flood Control Fund is created. The
State Treasurer shall credit to the fund such money as is specifically
appropriated during any session of the Legislature. The State Treasurer
shall also credit such fund with money contributed to or remitted by
local organizations which was obtained through the sale or lease of
property procured through the use of state funds as authorized in
sections 2-1502 to 2-1503.03. In addition, funds, services, and
properties made available by the United States or one of its departments
or agencies may be credited to the fund. The money in the fund shall not
-2-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
be subject to fiscal year or biennium limitations. Transfers may be made
from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
Any money in the Small Watersheds Flood Control Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 3. Section 2-1577, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
2-1577 (1) There is hereby created the Nebraska Soil and Water
Conservation Fund to be administered by the department. The State
Treasurer shall credit to the fund such money as is (a) transferred to
the fund by the Legislature, (b) paid to the state as fees, deposits,
payments, and repayments relating to the fund, both principal and
interest, and (c) donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions to
such fund from public or private entities. Funds made available by any
agency of the United States may also be credited to such fund if so
directed by such agency.
(2) The money in the fund shall not be subject to any fiscal-year
limitation or lapse provision of unexpended balance at the end of any
such fiscal year or biennium. Transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
(3) The Department of Administrative Services shall establish a
subaccount within the Nebraska Soil and Water Conservation Fund for the
accounting of any money transferred to the fund from the Nebraska
Environmental Trust Fund. Any money transferred from the Nebraska
Environmental Trust Fund to the Nebraska Soil and Water Conservation Fund
shall be expended in accordance with section 81-15,168.
(4) Any money in the Nebraska Soil and Water Conservation Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
-3-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Sec. 4. Section 2-1587, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-1587 (1) There is hereby created the Nebraska Resources
Development Fund to be administered by the department. The State
Treasurer shall credit to the fund, to carry out sections 2-1586 to
2-1595, such money as is (a) appropriated to or transferred into the fund
by the Legislature, (b) paid to the state as fees, deposits, payments,
and repayments relating to the fund, both principal and interest, and (c)
donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions to such fund from
public or private entities. Funds made available by any department or
agency of the United States may also be credited to this fund if so
directed by such department or agency. The money in the fund shall not be
subject to any fiscal year or biennium limitation requiring
reappropriation of the unexpended balance at the end of the fiscal year
or biennium. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at
the direction of the Legislature.
(2) To aid in the funding of projects and to prevent excessive
fluctuations in appropriation requirements for the Nebraska Resources
Development Fund, the department shall create a reserve fund to be used
only for projects requiring total expenditures from the Nebraska
Resources Development Fund in excess of five million dollars. Unless
disapproved by the Governor, the department may credit to such reserve
fund that portion of any appropriation to the Nebraska Resources
Development Fund which exceeds five million dollars. The department may
also credit to the reserve fund such other funds as it determines are
available.
(3) Any money in the Nebraska Resources Development Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 5. Section 2-15,122, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-4-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
amended to read:
2-15,122 There is hereby created the Natural Resources Water Quality
Fund. The State Treasurer shall credit to the fund for the uses and
purposes of section 2-15,123 such money as is specifically appropriated,
such funds, fees, donations, gifts, services, or devises or bequests of
real or personal property received by the department from any source,
federal, state, public, or private, to be used by the department for the
purpose of funding programs listed in subsection (2) of section 2-15,123,
and such money credited under sections 2-2634, 2-2638, and 2-2641. The
department shall allocate money from the fund pursuant to section
2-15,123. The fund shall be exempt from provisions relating to lapsing of
appropriations, and the unexpended and unencumbered balance existing in
the fund on June 30 each year shall be reappropriated , except that
transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature. Any money in the Natural Resources Water Quality Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 6. Section 2-5106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-5106 The Buffer Strip Incentive Fund is created. Proceeds raised
from fees imposed for the registration of pesticides and earmarked for
the fund pursuant to section 2-2634, proceeds raised from federal grants
earmarked for the fund, and any proceeds raised from public or private
donations made to the fund shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the fund. The fund shall be administered by the department to
maintain the buffer strip program and for expenses directly related to
the program, including necessary expenses of the department in carrying
out its duties and responsibilities under the Buffer Strip Act , except
that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. The annual cost of administering the buffer
-5-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
strip program shall not exceed ten percent of the total annual proceeds
credited to the Buffer Strip Incentive Fund. Such administrative costs
shall include funds allocated by the department to the districts for
their administrative costs. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 7. Section 8-604, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is amended
to read:
8-604 (1) The Financial Institution Assessment Cash Fund is hereby
created. The fund shall be used solely for the purposes of administering
and enforcing the laws specified in section 8-601 , except that transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature.
(2) Any money in the Financial Institution Assessment Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment
earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the
General Fund.
Sec. 8. Section 8-1120, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
8-1120 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Securities Act of Nebraska shall be administered by the Director of
Banking and Finance who may employ such deputies, examiners, assistants,
or counsel as may be reasonably necessary for the purpose thereof. The
employment of any person for the administration of the act is subject to
section 49-1499.07. The director may delegate to a deputy director or
counsel any powers, authority, and duties imposed upon or granted to the
director under the act, such as may be lawfully delegated under the
common law or the statutes of this state. The director may also employ
-6-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
special counsel with respect to any investigation conducted by him or her
under the act or with respect to any litigation to which the director is
a party under the act.
(2) A security issued by and representing an interest in or a debt
of, or guaranteed by, any insurance company shall be registered, pursuant
to the provisions of sections 8-1104 to 8-1109, with the Director of
Insurance who shall as to such registrations administer and enforce the
act, and as pertains to the administration and enforcement of such
registration of such securities all references in the act to director
shall mean the Director of Insurance.
(3)(a) It shall be unlawful for the director or any of his or her
employees to use for personal benefit any information which is filed with
or obtained by the director and which is not made public. Neither the
director nor any of his or her employees shall disclose any confidential
information except among themselves, when necessary or appropriate in a
proceeding, examination, or investigation under the act, or as authorized
in subdivision (3)(b) of this subsection. No provision of the act shall
either create or derogate from any privilege which exists at common law
or otherwise when documentary or other evidence is sought under a
subpoena directed to the director or any of his or her employees.
(b)(i) In administering the act, the director may also:
(A) Enter into agreements or relationships with other government
officials, including, but not limited to, the securities administrator of
a foreign state and the Securities and Exchange Commission, or self-
regulatory organizations, to share resources, standardized or uniform
methods or procedures, and documents, records, and information; or
(B) Accept and rely on examination or investigation reports made by
other government officials, including, but not limited to, the securities
administrator of a foreign state and the Securities and Exchange
Commission, or self-regulatory organizations.
(ii) For purposes of this subdivision, foreign state means any state
-7-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
of the United States, other than the State of Nebraska, any territory of
the United States, including Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Trust
Territory of the Pacific Islands, or the Virgin Islands, and the District
of Columbia.
(4) The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and
prescribe forms to carry out the act. No rule and regulation may be
adopted and promulgated or form may be prescribed unless the director
finds that the action is necessary or appropriate in the public interest
or for the protection of investors and consistent with the purposes
fairly intended by the policy and provisions of the act. In adopting and
promulgating rules and regulations and prescribing forms the director may
cooperate with the securities administrators of the other states and the
Securities and Exchange Commission with a view to effectuating the policy
of the Securities Act of Nebraska to achieve maximum uniformity in the
form and content of registration statements, applications, and reports
wherever practicable. All rules and regulations and forms of the director
shall be published and made available to any person upon request.
(5) No provision of the act imposing any liability shall apply to
any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with any rule and
regulation, form, or order of the director, notwithstanding that the rule
and regulation or form may later be amended or rescinded or be determined
by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.
(6) Every hearing in an administrative proceeding shall be public
unless the director in his or her discretion grants a request joined in
by all the respondents that the hearing be conducted privately.
(7)(a) The Securities Act Cash Fund is created. All filing fees,
registration fees, and all other fees and all money collected by or paid
to the director under any of the provisions of the act shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund, except that registration
fees collected by or paid to the Director of Insurance pursuant to the
provisions of the act shall be credited to the Department of Insurance
-8-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Cash Fund. The Securities Act Cash Fund shall be used for the purpose of
administering and enforcing the provisions of the act , except that
transfers may be made to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the Securities Act Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
(b) The State Treasurer shall transfer thirty-four million dollars
from the Securities Act Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June
30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-eight million dollars
from the Securities Act Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June
30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-eight million dollars
from the Securities Act Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June
30, 2028, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-eight million dollars
from the Securities Act Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June
30, 2029, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(8) A document is filed when it is received by the director. The
director shall keep a register of all applications for registration and
registration statements which are or have ever been effective under the
Securities Act of Nebraska and all denial, suspension, or revocation
orders which have ever been entered under the act. The register shall be
open for public inspection. The information contained in or filed with
any registration statement, application, or report may be made available
-9-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
to the public under such conditions as the director may prescribe.
(9) The director may, by rule and regulation or order, authorize or
require the filing of any document required to be filed under the act by
electronic or other means, processes, or systems.
(10) Upon request and at such reasonable charges as he or she shall
prescribe, the director shall furnish to any person photostatic or other
copies, certified under his or her seal of office if requested, of any
entry in the register or any document which is a matter of public record.
In any proceeding or prosecution under the act, any copy so certified
shall be prima facie evidence of the contents of the entry or document
certified.
(11) The director in his or her discretion may honor requests from
interested persons for interpretative opinions.
Sec. 9. Section 9-1,101, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
9-1,101 (1) The Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska County and City
Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Pickle
Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, and section
9-701 shall be administered and enforced by the Charitable Gaming
Division of the Department of Revenue, which division is hereby created.
The Department of Revenue shall make annual reports to the Governor,
Legislature, Auditor of Public Accounts, and Attorney General on all tax
revenue received, expenses incurred, and other activities relating to the
administration and enforcement of such acts. The report submitted to the
Legislature shall be submitted electronically.
(2) The Charitable Gaming Operations Fund is hereby created. Any
money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(3)(a) Forty percent of the taxes collected pursuant to sections
9-239, 9-344, 9-429, and 9-648 shall be available to the Charitable
-10-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Gaming Division for administering and enforcing the acts listed in
subsection (1) of this section and providing administrative support for
the Nebraska Commission on Problem Gambling. The remaining sixty percent
shall be transferred to the General Fund. Any portion of the forty
percent not used by the division in the administration and enforcement of
such acts and section shall be distributed as provided in this
subsection.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2019, through June 30, 2026, on or before the
last day of the last month of each calendar quarter, the State Treasurer
shall transfer one hundred thousand dollars from the Charitable Gaming
Operations Fund to the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund.
(c) Any money remaining in the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund
after the transfer pursuant to subdivision (b) of this subsection not
used by the Charitable Gaming Division in its administration and
enforcement duties pursuant to this section may be transferred to the
General Fund and the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund at the direction
of the Legislature.
(4) The Tax Commissioner shall employ investigators who shall be
vested with the authority and power of a law enforcement officer to carry
out the laws of this state administered by the Tax Commissioner or the
Department of Revenue and to enforce sections 28-1101 to 28-1117 relating
to possession of a gambling device. For purposes of enforcing sections
28-1101 to 28-1117, the authority of the investigators shall be limited
to investigating possession of a gambling device, notifying local law
enforcement authorities, and reporting suspected violations to the county
attorney for prosecution.
(5) The Charitable Gaming Division may charge a fee for publications
and listings it produces. The fee shall not exceed the cost of
publication and distribution of such items. The division may also charge
a fee for making a copy of any record in its possession equal to the
actual cost per page. The division shall remit the fees to the State
-11-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Treasurer for credit to the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund.
(6) The taxes collected and available to the Charitable Gaming
Division pursuant to section 77-3012 shall be used by the division for
enforcement of the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act and maintenance of
the central server established pursuant to section 77-3013.
(7) For administrative purposes only, the Nebraska Commission on
Problem Gambling shall be located within the Charitable Gaming Division.
The division shall provide office space, furniture, equipment, and
stationery and other necessary supplies for the commission. Commission
staff shall be appointed, supervised, and terminated by the director of
the Gamblers Assistance Program pursuant to section 9-1004.
Sec. 10. Section 9-1107, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
9-1107 (1) The Racetrack Gaming Fund is created. The fund shall
consist of all license, application, and other fees collected under the
Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act and all license fees and gross tax receipts
collected by the commission under sections 2-1203, 2-1203.01, and 2-1208
relating to horseracing but shall not include taxes collected pursuant to
section 2-1208.01. The fund shall be used for administration of the
Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act and the administration of horseracing
pursuant to Chapter 2, article 12. Transfers may be made from the fund to
the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Racetrack Gaming Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024,
any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be
credited to the General Fund.
(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the Racing and
Gaming Commission's Racing Cash Fund on September 3, 2025, to the
Racetrack Gaming Fund.
Sec. 11. Section 13-2610, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
-12-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
amended to read:
13-2610 (1) Upon the annual certification under section 13-2609, the
State Treasurer shall transfer after the audit the amount certified to
the Convention Center Support Fund. The Convention Center Support Fund is
created. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Convention Center Support
Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(2)(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate from the
fund to any political subdivision for which an application for state
assistance under the Convention Center Facility Financing Assistance Act
has been approved (i) an annual amount not to exceed seventy percent of
the state sales tax revenue collected by retailers and operators doing
business at such facilities on sales at such facilities, state sales tax
revenue collected on primary and secondary box office sales of admissions
to such facilities, and state sales tax revenue collected by associated
hotels and nearby retailers and (ii) an aggregate amount of not more than
the maximum aggregate appropriation. State assistance shall not be used
for an operating subsidy.
(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature to appropriate from
the fund to any city of the metropolitan class for which an application
for state assistance under the Convention Center Facility Financing
Assistance Act has been approved an amount not to exceed the amount of
money transferred to the fund pursuant to subdivision (9)(a) of section
13-3108.
(3)(a) Ten percent of the funds appropriated to a city of the
metropolitan class under subdivision (2)(a) of this section and all of
the funds appropriated to a city of the metropolitan class under
subdivision (2)(b) of this section shall be equally distributed to areas
with a high concentration of poverty. Fifty-five percent of such funds
-13-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
shall be used to showcase important historical aspects of such areas or
areas within close geographic proximity of the area with a high
concentration of poverty and to assist with the reduction of street and
gang violence in such areas. Forty-five percent of such funds shall be
used to assist with small business and entrepreneurship growth in such
areas.
(b) Each area with a high concentration of poverty that has been
distributed funds under subdivision (3)(a) of this section shall
establish a development fund and form a committee which shall identify
and research potential projects to be completed in the area with a high
concentration of poverty or in an area within close geographic proximity
of such area if the project would have a significant or demonstrable
impact on such area and make final determinations on the use of the funds
received for such projects.
(c) A committee formed under subdivision (3)(b) of this section
shall include the following members:
(i) The member of the city council whose district includes a
majority of the census tracts which each contain a percentage of persons
below the poverty line of greater than thirty percent, as determined by
the most recent American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate, within the
area with a high concentration of poverty;
(ii) The commissioner of the county whose district includes a
majority of the census tracts which each contain a percentage of persons
below the poverty line of greater than thirty percent, as determined by
the most recent American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate, within the
area with a high concentration of poverty;
(iii) Two residents of the area with a high concentration of
poverty, appointed by the two members of the committee described in
subdivisions (3)(c)(i) and (ii) of this section. Such resident members
shall be appointed for four-year terms. Each time a resident member is to
be appointed pursuant to this subdivision, the committee shall solicit
-14-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
applications from interested individuals by posting notice of the open
position on the city's website and on the city's official social media
accounts, if any, and by publishing the notice in a legal newspaper in or
of general circulation in the area with a high concentration of poverty.
Applications may be submitted to either of the committee members
described in subdivisions (3)(c)(i) and (ii) of this section. Prior to
making any appointment, the committee shall hold a public hearing in the
area with a high concentration of poverty. Notice of the hearing shall be
provided, at least seven days prior to the hearing, by posting the notice
on the city's website and on the city's official social media accounts,
if any, and by publishing the notice in a legal newspaper in or of
general circulation in the area with a high concentration of poverty; and
(iv) The member of the Legislature whose district includes a
majority of the census tracts which each contain a percentage of persons
below the poverty line of greater than thirty percent, as determined by
the most recent American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate, within the
area with a high concentration of poverty. The member described in this
subdivision shall be a nonvoting member of the committee.
(d) A committee formed under subdivision (3)(b) of this section
shall solicit project ideas from the public and shall hold a public
hearing in the area with a high concentration of poverty. Notice of a
proposed hearing shall be provided in accordance with the procedures for
notice of a public hearing pursuant to section 18-2115.01. The committee
shall research potential projects and make the final determination
regarding the annual distribution of funding to such projects.
(e) For any committee formed under subdivision (3)(b) of this
section:
(i) The two committee members described in subdivisions (3)(c)(i)
and (ii) of this section shall share joint responsibility of all
committee operations and meetings. Applications for funding may be
submitted to either of such members; and
-15-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
(ii) All applications, reports, and other records of the committee
shall be accessible to any member of the committee.
(f) Each recipient of funding from a committee formed under
subdivision (3)(b) of this section shall submit an itemized report to
such committee on the use of such funds. A recipient shall not be
eligible to receive funding for more than three consecutive years unless
such recipient is able to justify continued funding based on the
following criteria:
(i) The number of people served by the project;
(ii) The relevance and scale of the project;
(iii) The desirability of the social or environmental outcomes of
the project and how such outcomes will be achievable and measurable;
(iv) The economic impact on the area with a high concentration of
poverty; and
(v) The recipient's sustainability plan.
(g) On or before July 1, 2022, and on or before July 1 of each year
thereafter, a committee formed under subdivision (3)(b) of this section
shall electronically submit a report to the Legislature which includes:
(i) A description of the projects that were funded during the most
recently completed calendar year;
(ii) A description of where such projects were located;
(iii) A description of the outcomes of such projects; and
(iv) A ten-year strategic plan on how the committee plans to meet
the goals described in subdivision (3)(a) of this section.
(h) For purposes of this subsection, an area with a high
concentration of poverty means an area within the corporate limits of a
city of the metropolitan class consisting of one or more contiguous
census tracts, as determined by the most recent American Community Survey
5-Year Estimate, which contain a percentage of persons below the poverty
line of greater than thirty percent, and all census tracts contiguous to
such tract or tracts.
-16-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
(4)(a) Ten percent of the funds appropriated to a city of the
primary class under subdivision (2)(a) of this section may, if the city
determines by consent of the city council that such funds are not
currently needed for the purposes described in section 13-2604, be used
as follows:
(i) For investment in the construction of qualified low-income
housing projects as defined in 26 U.S.C. 42, including qualified projects
receiving Nebraska affordable housing tax credits under the Affordable
Housing Tax Credit Act; or
(ii) If there are no such qualified low-income housing projects as
defined in 26 U.S.C. 42 being constructed or expected to be constructed
within the political subdivision, for investment in areas with a high
concentration of poverty to assist with low-income housing needs.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, an area with a high
concentration of poverty means an area within the corporate limits of a
city of the primary class consisting of one or more contiguous census
tracts, as determined by the most recent American Community Survey 5-Year
Estimate, which contain a percentage of persons below the poverty line of
greater than thirty percent, and all census tracts contiguous to such
tract or tracts, as determined by the most recent American Community
Survey 5-Year Estimate.
(5) State assistance to the political subdivision shall no longer be
available (a) upon the retirement of the bonds issued to acquire,
construct, improve, repair, replace, or equip all of the political
subdivision's facilities approved for state assistance under the
Convention Center Facility Financing Assistance Act or any subsequent
bonds that refunded the original issue or (b) when state assistance
reaches the amount determined under subdivision (2)(a) of this section,
whichever comes first.
(6) The remaining thirty percent of state sales tax revenue
collected by retailers and operators doing business at such facilities on
-17-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
sales at such facilities, state sales tax revenue collected on primary
and secondary box office sales of admissions to such facilities, and
state sales tax revenue collected by associated hotels and nearby
retailers, shall be appropriated by the Legislature to the Civic and
Community Center Financing Fund. Upon the annual certification required
pursuant to section 13-2609 and following the transfer to the Convention
Center Support Fund required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section,
the State Treasurer shall transfer an amount equal to the remaining
thirty percent from the Convention Center Support Fund to the Civic and
Community Center Financing Fund.
(7) Any municipality that has applied for and received a grant of
assistance under the Civic and Community Center Financing Act may not
receive state assistance under the Convention Center Facility Financing
Assistance Act.
Sec. 12. Section 28-429, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-429 (1) There is hereby established in the Nebraska State Patrol
a Division of Drug Control. The division shall consist of such personnel
as may be designated by the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public
Safety. It shall be the duty of the division to enforce all of the
provisions of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act and any other
provisions of the law dealing with controlled substances and to conduct
drug education activities as directed by the superintendent. The Nebraska
State Patrol shall cooperate with federal agencies, the department, other
state agencies, elementary and secondary schools, and County Drug Law
Enforcement and Education Fund Boards in discharging their
responsibilities concerning traffic in controlled substances, in
suppressing the abuse of controlled substances, and in conducting drug
education activities. To this end the division is authorized to: (a)
Arrange for the exchange of information between governmental officials
concerning the use and abuse of controlled substances; (b) coordinate and
-18-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
cooperate in training programs on controlled substance law enforcement
and education at the local and state levels; (c) establish a centralized
unit which will accept, catalog, file, and collect statistics, including
records of drug dependent persons and other controlled substance law
offenders within the state, and make such information available for
federal, state, and local law enforcement purposes on request; (d)
cooperate in locating, eradicating, and destroying wild or illicit growth
of plant species from which controlled substances may be extracted, and
for these purposes a peace officer is hereby authorized to enter onto
property upon which there are no buildings or upon which there are only
uninhabited buildings without first obtaining a search warrant or
consent; (e) develop a priority program so as to focus the bulk of its
efforts on the reduction and elimination of the most damaging drugs
including narcotic drugs, depressant and stimulant drugs, and
hallucinogenic drugs; and (f) develop and conduct drug education
activities in cooperation with elementary and secondary schools in
Nebraska and with County Drug Law Enforcement and Education Fund Boards.
(2) There is hereby created the Nebraska State Patrol Drug Control
and Education Cash Fund which shall be used for the purposes of (a)
obtaining evidence for enforcement of any state law relating to the
control of drug abuse and (b) drug education activities conducted
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section , except that transfers may be
made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska State Patrol Drug Control and
Education Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(3) For the purpose of establishing and maintaining legislative
oversight and accountability, the Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature shall formulate record-keeping procedures to be adhered to by
the Nebraska State Patrol for all expenditures, disbursements, and
-19-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
transfers of cash from the Nebraska State Patrol Drug Control and
Education Cash Fund. Based on these record-keeping procedures, the
Nebraska State Patrol shall prepare and electronically deliver to the
Clerk of the Legislature at the commencement of each succeeding session a
detailed report which shall contain, but not be limited to: (a) Current
total in the cash fund; (b) total amount of expenditures; (c) purpose of
the expenditures to include: (i) Salaries and any expenses of all agents
and informants; (ii) front money for drug purchases; (iii) names of drugs
and quantity of purchases; (iv) amount of front money recovered; and (v)
drug education activities; (d) total number of informers on payroll; (e)
amounts delivered to patrol supervisors for distribution to agents and
informants and the method of accounting for such transactions and the
results procured through such transactions; and (f) a description of the
drug education activities conducted since the date of the previous
report. Each member of the Legislature shall receive an electronic copy
of such report by making a request for it to the superintendent.
(4) The superintendent shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 13. Section 29-3921, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-3921 (1) The Commission on Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund
is created. The fund shall be used for the operations of the commission ,
except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at
the direction of the Legislature through June 30, 2011. The Commission on
Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund shall consist of money remitted
pursuant to section 33-156. It is the intent of the Legislature that the
commission shall be funded solely from the fund. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(2) On July 1, 2011, or as soon thereafter as administratively
-20-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
possible, the State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred thousand dollars
from the Commission on Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund to the
Supreme Court Education Fund. The State Court Administrator shall use
these funds to assist the juvenile justice system in providing prefiling
and diversion programming designed to reduce excessive absenteeism and
unnecessary involvement with the juvenile justice system.
(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer the following amounts from
the Commission on Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund to the Court
Appointed Special Advocate Fund:
(a) On July 1, 2011, or as soon thereafter as administratively
possible, one hundred thousand dollars; and
(b) On July 1, 2012, or as soon thereafter as administratively
possible, two hundred thousand dollars.
(4) On July 1, 2012, or as soon thereafter as administratively
possible, the State Treasurer shall transfer sixty thousand dollars from
the Commission on Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund to the Nebraska
State Patrol Cash Fund.
The Nebraska State Patrol shall use such funds to contract with the
University of Nebraska to study sex offender recidivism data before and
after the passage of Laws 2009, LB285, which changed the Nebraska sex
offender classification system from an evaluation of risk assessment
system to an offense-based assessment system in the attempt by the state
to comply with federal requirements under the Adam Walsh Child Protection
and Safety Act of 2006.
Sec. 14. Section 37-351, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
37-351 There is hereby created a fund to be known as the Nebraska
Outdoor Recreation Development Cash Fund. The fund shall contain the
money received pursuant to section 77-2602 and any funds donated as
gifts, bequests, or other contributions to such fund from public or
private entities. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund
-21-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska Outdoor
Recreation Development Cash Fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 15. Section 38-157, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-157 (1) The Professional and Occupational Credentialing Cash Fund
is created. Except as provided in section 71-17,113, the fund shall
consist of all fees, gifts, grants, and other money, excluding fines and
civil penalties, received or collected by the department under sections
38-151 to 38-156 and the Nebraska Regulation of Health Professions Act.
(2) The department shall use the fund for the administration and
enforcement of such laws regulating the individuals and businesses listed
in section 38-121. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General
Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The State Treasurer shall
transfer any money in the Professional and Occupational Credentialing
Cash Fund for licensing activities under the Water Well Standards and
Contractors' Practice Act on July 1, 2021, to the Water Well Standards
and Contractors' Licensing Fund.
(3) Any money in the Professional and Occupational Credentialing
Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any
investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be
credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 16. Section 44-116, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
44-116 (1) All money collected by the Department of Insurance for
examination of the affairs of domestic, foreign, or alien insurance
companies and insurers as defined in and pursuant to the Insurers
Examination Act or any other provision of Chapter 44 or for valuing the
-22-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
reserve liabilities of life insurance companies shall be remitted by the
department to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of
Insurance Cash Fund, which fund is hereby created. Money in the
Department of Insurance Cash Fund may be used for transfers to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Department of Insurance Cash Fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer fourteen million dollars from
the Department of Insurance Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before
June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer eleven
million dollars from the Department of Insurance Cash Fund to the General
Fund on or before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer
eleven million dollars from the Department of Insurance Cash Fund to the
General Fund on or before June 30, 2028, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services. The State Treasurer shall
transfer eleven million dollars from the Department of Insurance Cash
Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2029, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 17. Section 46-1121, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-1121 (1) To aid in defraying the cost of administration of the
Nebraska Chemigation Act, the district shall collect an initial
application fee for a permit, a special permit fee, an annual renewal
fee, and an emergency permit fee. The fees shall be established by the
-23-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
district and shall be sufficient to cover the ongoing administrative
costs and the costs of annual inspection programs by the district and
department. The fees collected pursuant to this section shall be
established by the district in the amount necessary to pay reasonable
costs of administering the permit program pursuant to the act. The fee
for a permit and special permit shall not exceed one hundred fifty
dollars. The fee for a renewal permit shall not exceed one hundred
dollars. The fee for an emergency permit under section 46-1119 shall not
exceed five hundred dollars. The district shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations establishing a fee schedule to be paid to the
district by a person or persons applying for a permit to operate a
chemigation system.
(2) The fee for initial application for a permit or special permit
shall be payable to the district. For each permit, five dollars shall be
paid by the district to the department.
(3) The annual fee for renewal of a permit or special permit shall
be payable to the district. For each permit, two dollars of the annual
fee shall be paid by the district to the department.
(4) All fees shall be used by the district and the department to
administer the Nebraska Chemigation Act. The department's fee shall be
credited to the Chemigation Costs Fund which is hereby created. All fees
collected by the department pursuant to the act shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the fund. Transfers may be made from the
fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money
in the Chemigation Costs Fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(5) All permits issued pursuant to sections 46-1117 and 46-1117.01
shall be annual permits and shall expire each year on June 1. A permit
may be renewed each year upon payment of the annual renewal fee and
completion of a form provided by the district which lists the names of
-24-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
all chemicals used in chemigation the previous year. Once a permit has
expired, it shall not be reinstated without meeting all of the
requirements for a new permit including an inspection and payment of the
initial application fee.
Sec. 18. Section 46-1403, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
46-1403 There is hereby created the Water Well Decommissioning Fund.
The State Treasurer shall credit to the fund for the uses and purposes of
sections 46-1401 to 46-1405 such money as is specifically appropriated
and such funds, fees, donations, gifts, services, or devises or bequests
of real or personal property received by the Department of Water, Energy,
and Environment from any source, federal, state, public, or private, to
be used by the department for the purpose of accelerating the
decommissioning of illegal water wells. The department shall allocate
money from the fund for purposes of sections 46-1401 to 46-1405. The fund
shall be exempt from provisions relating to lapsing of appropriations.
Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature. Any money in the Water Well Decommissioning Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 19. Section 47-632, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
47-632 (1) The Community Corrections Uniform Data Analysis Cash Fund
is created. Except as provided in subsection subsections (2) , (3), and
(4) of this section, the fund shall be within the Nebraska Commission on
Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice, shall be administered by the
division, and shall only be used to support operations costs and analysis
relating to the implementation and coordination of the uniform analysis
of crime data pursuant to the Community Corrections Act, including
associated information technology projects. The fund shall consist of
-25-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
money collected pursuant to section 47-633.
(2) Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature.
(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer the following amounts from
the Community Corrections Uniform Data Analysis Cash Fund to the Violence
Prevention Cash Fund:
(a) Two hundred thousand dollars on July 1, 2011, or as soon
thereafter as administratively possible; and
(b) Two hundred thousand dollars on July 1, 2012, or as soon
thereafter as administratively possible.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer the following amounts from
the Community Corrections Uniform Data Analysis Cash Fund to the Nebraska
Law Enforcement Training Center Cash Fund:
(a) Two hundred thousand dollars on July 1, 2017, or as soon
thereafter as administratively possible; and
(b) Two hundred thousand dollars on July 1, 2018, or as soon
thereafter as administratively possible.
(2) (5) Any money in the Community Corrections Uniform Data Analysis
Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 20. Section 48-1,116, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
48-1,116 The Compensation Court Cash Fund is hereby created. The
fund shall be used to aid in providing for the expense of administering
the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act and the payment of the salaries
and expenses of the personnel of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation
Court.
All fees received pursuant to sections 48-120, 48-120.02, 48-138,
48-139, 48-145.04, and 48-165 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer
for credit to the Compensation Court Cash Fund. The fund shall also
-26-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
consist of amounts credited to the fund pursuant to sections 48-1,113,
48-1,114, and 77-912. The State Treasurer may receive and credit to the
fund any money which may at any time be contributed to the state or the
fund by the federal government or any agency thereof to which the state
may be or become entitled under any act of Congress or otherwise by
reason of any payment made from the fund.
Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature until June 30, 2026. Any money in the
Compensation Court Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 21. Section 49-708, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-708 The Nebraska Statutes Cash Fund is created. The fund shall
consist of funds received pursuant to section 49-707. The fund shall be
used by the Revisor of Statutes to perform the duties required by
subdivision (4) of section 49-702 and section 49-704 , except that
transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska Statutes Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
The Nebraska Statutes Distribution Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall consist of funds received pursuant to section 49-707. The fund
shall be used by the Supreme Court to perform the duties required by such
section. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 22. Section 49-14,140, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
49-14,140 The Nebraska Accountability and Disclosure Commission Cash
-27-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Fund is hereby created. The fund shall consist of funds received by the
commission pursuant to sections 49-1449.01, 49-1470, 49-1480.01, 49-1482,
49-14,123, and 49-14,123.01 and subdivision (1)(d) of section 49-14,126.
The fund shall be used by the commission in administering the Nebraska
Political Accountability and Disclosure Act. Any money in the Nebraska
Accountability and Disclosure Commission Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund
at the direction of the Legislature.
On April 25, 2013, the State Treasurer shall transfer $630,870 from
the Campaign Finance Limitation Cash Fund to the Nebraska Accountability
and Disclosure Commission Cash Fund to be used for development,
implementation, and maintenance of an electronic filing system for
campaign statements and other reports under the Nebraska Political
Accountability and Disclosure Act and for making such statements and
reports available to the public on the website of the commission. The
State Treasurer shall transfer the balance of the Campaign Finance
Limitation Cash Fund to the Election Administration Fund on or before
July 5, 2013, or as soon thereafter as administratively possible.
Sec. 23. Section 50-114.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
50-114.05 The Clerk of the Legislature Cash Fund is hereby created.
The fund shall consist of funds received by the Clerk of the Legislature
pursuant to sections 49-1480.01 and 49-1482. The fund shall be used by
the Clerk of the Legislature to perform the duties required by sections
49-1480 to 49-1492.01 , except that transfers may be made from the fund
to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Clerk of the Legislature Cash Fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
-28-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Sec. 24. Section 50-437, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
50-437 There is hereby created the Nebraska Legislative Shared
Information System Cash Fund, which fund shall consist of fees received
from services provided by the Legislature. Transfers may be made from the
fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money
in the Nebraska Legislative Shared Information System Cash Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 25. Section 50-501, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
50-501 (1) The Bioscience Steering Committee is created. The
committee shall consist of the chairperson of the Revenue Committee of
the Legislature or his or her designee, the chairperson of the
Appropriations Committee or his or her designee, and three members of the
Legislature selected by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.
The executive board shall appoint a chairperson and vice-chairperson of
the committee.
(2) The committee shall conduct a study to measure the impact of the
bioscience economy in Nebraska and prepare a strategic plan for growing
the bioscience economy in Nebraska. The strategic plan shall report on
any progress or remaining work since the last study conducted on the
bioscience industry. The strategic plan shall further propose strategies
for developing the bioscience economy and shall include, but not be
limited to, strategies to (a) stimulate job growth in the fields of
science, technology, and engineering throughout Nebraska, (b) encourage
individuals and organizations engaged in the biotechnology businesses to
locate and expand in Nebraska, (c) capture and commercialize technology
that is discovered and developed in Nebraska, (d) grow Nebraska's
investment capital market and incentivize investment in life science
-29-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
start-up companies, and (e) develop Nebraska's biotechnology workforce in
cooperation with higher education institutions. The strategic plan shall
estimate the wealth and number of jobs generated from expanding the
bioscience economy.
(3) The committee, in consultation with the executive board, shall
commission a nonprofit corporation to provide research, analysis, and
recommendations to the committee for the development of the study and
strategic plan. The nonprofit corporation shall be incorporated pursuant
to the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, shall be organized exclusively
for nonprofit purposes within the meaning of section 501(c)(6) of the
Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01, shall be engaged
in activities to facilitate and promote the growth of life sciences
within Nebraska, and shall be dedicated to the development and growth of
the bioscience economy.
(4) The committee shall prepare and present electronically to the
Legislature a statewide strategic plan for the bioscience economy during
the One Hundred Fifth Legislature, First Session, for consideration by
the Legislature.
(5)(a) The Biotechnology Development Cash Fund is created. The money
in the fund shall be used to commission the nonprofit corporation and
provide access to resources necessary for developing the study and
strategic plan.
(b) The fund may receive gifts, bequests, grants, or other
contributions or donations from public or private entities. Transfers may
be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the Biotechnology Development Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(c) The Biotechnology Development Cash Fund terminates July 1, 2026.
Sec. 26. Section 53-117.06, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-30-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
2024, is amended to read:
53-117.06 Any money collected by the commission pursuant to section
53-117.05, 53-165.01, or 53-167.02 shall be credited to the Nebraska
Liquor Control Commission Rule and Regulation Cash Fund, which fund is
hereby created. The purpose of the fund shall be to cover any
administrative costs, including salary and benefits, incurred by the
commission in producing or distributing the material referred to in such
sections and to defray the costs associated with electronic regulatory
transactions, industry education events, enforcement training, and
equipment for regulatory work. Transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Nebraska Liquor Control Commission Rule and Regulation Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 27. Section 54-857, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-857 All money received pursuant to the Commercial Feed Act shall
be remitted by the director to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Commercial Feed Administration Cash Fund which is hereby created. Such
fund shall be used by the department to aid in defraying the expenses of
administering the act and to aid in defraying the expenses related to a
cooperative agreement with the United States Department of Agriculture
Market News reporting program. Transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Commercial Feed Administration Cash Fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 28. Section 54-2428, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-2428 (1) Any person required to obtain a National Pollutant
-31-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Discharge Elimination System permit for an animal feeding operation or a
construction and operating permit for a livestock waste control facility
shall file an application with the department accompanied by the
appropriate fees in the manner established by the department. The
application fee shall be established by the council with a maximum fee of
two hundred dollars. For major modifications to an application or a
permit, the fee shall equal the amount of the application fee.
(2) On or before March 1, 2006, and each year thereafter, each
person who has a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit
or who has a large concentrated animal feeding operation, as defined in
40 C.F.R. 122 and 123, as such regulations existed on January 1, 2004,
and a state operating permit, a construction and operating permit, or a
construction approval issued pursuant to the Environmental Protection Act
or the Livestock Waste Management Act shall pay a per head annual fee
based on the permitted capacity identified in the permit for that
facility. The department shall invoice each permittee by February 1,
2006, and February 1 of each year thereafter.
(3) The initial annual fee shall be: Beef cattle, ten cents per
head; veal calves, ten cents per head; dairy cows, fifteen cents per
head; swine larger than fifty-five pounds, four dollars per one hundred
head or fraction thereof; swine less than fifty pounds, one dollar per
one hundred head or fraction thereof; horses, twenty cents per head;
sheep or lambs, one dollar per one hundred head or fraction thereof;
turkeys, two dollars per one thousand head or fraction thereof; chickens
or ducks with liquid manure facility, three dollars per one thousand head
or fraction thereof; and chickens or ducks with other than liquid manure
facility, one dollar per one thousand head or fraction thereof. This fee
structure may be reviewed in fiscal year 2007-08.
(4) Beginning in fiscal year 2007-08, the department shall annually
review and adjust the fee structure in this section and section 54-2423
to ensure that fees are adequate to meet twenty percent of the program
-32-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
costs from the previous fiscal year. All fees collected under this
section and sections 54-2423, 54-2435, and 54-2436 shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer for credit to the Livestock Waste Management Cash
Fund which is created for the purposes described in the Livestock Waste
Management Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund
at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Livestock Waste
Management Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(5) On or before January 1 of each year, the department shall submit
electronically a report to the Legislature in sufficient detail to
document all direct and indirect costs incurred in the previous fiscal
year in carrying out the Livestock Waste Management Act, including the
number of inspections conducted, the number of animal feeding operations
with livestock waste control facilities, the number of animal feeding
operations inspected, the size of the livestock waste control facilities,
the results of water quality monitoring programs, and other elements
relating to carrying out the act. The Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature shall review the report in its analysis of executive programs
in order to verify that the revenue generated from fees was used solely
to offset appropriate and reasonable costs associated with carrying out
the act.
Sec. 29. Section 55-131, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
55-131 The Military Department Cash Fund is created. The fund shall
be administered by the Adjutant General. The fund shall consist of all
nonfederal revenue received by the National Guard pursuant to this
section. The Adjutant General is hereby authorized to accept by devise,
gift, or otherwise and hold, as trustee, for the benefit and use of the
National Guard or any part thereof any property, real or personal; to
invest and reinvest the property; to collect, receive, and recover the
-33-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
rents, incomes, and issues from the property; and to expend them as
provided by the terms of the devise or gift, or if not so provided, to
expend them for the benefit and use of the National Guard as he or she in
his or her discretion shall determine, subject to the approval of the
Governor. Except as otherwise provided by law, all other money received
by the National Guard and derived from any other source shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for credit to the Military Department Cash Fund.
Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature. Any money in the Military Department Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 30. Section 59-1608.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
59-1608.04 (1) The State Settlement Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall be maintained by the Department of Justice and administered by the
Attorney General. Except as otherwise provided by law, the fund shall
consist of all recoveries received pursuant to the Consumer Protection
Act, including any money, funds, securities, or other things of value in
the nature of civil damages or other payment, except criminal penalties,
whether such recovery is by way of verdict, judgment, compromise, or
settlement in or out of court, or other final disposition of any case or
controversy, or any other payments received on behalf of the state by the
Department of Justice and administered by the Attorney General for the
benefit of the state or the general welfare of its citizens, but
excluding all funds held in a trust capacity where specific benefits
accrue to specific individuals, organizations, or governments. The fund
may be expended for any allowable legal purposes as determined by the
Attorney General. Transfers from the State Settlement Cash Fund may be
made at the direction of the Legislature to the Nebraska Capital
Construction Fund, the Legal Education for Public Service and Rural
-34-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund, the Nebraska State Patrol Cash
Fund, and the Financial Literacy Cash Fund , and the General Fund. To
provide necessary financial accountability and management oversight,
revenue from individual settlement agreements or other separate sources
credited to the State Settlement Cash Fund may be tracked and accounted
for within the state accounting system through the use of separate and
distinct funds, subfunds, or any other available accounting mechanism
specifically approved by the Accounting Administrator for use by the
Department of Justice. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment
of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million five hundred
thousand dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Nebraska
Capital Construction Fund on July 1, 2013, or as soon thereafter as
administratively possible.
(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer eight hundred seventy-six
thousand nine hundred ninety-eight dollars from the State Settlement Cash
Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2018, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer one million seven hundred
fifty-six thousand six hundred thirty-nine dollars from the State
Settlement Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2019, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(5) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred twenty-five
thousand dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Legal
Education for Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance
Fund on or before April 30, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as
-35-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(6) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Legal Education for
Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund on or
before July 9, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 31. Section 60-3,201, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
60-3,201 There is hereby created the Motor Carrier Division Cash
Fund. Such fund shall be used by the Division of Motor Carrier Services
of the department to carry out the operations of the division including
the administration of titling and registering vehicles in
interjurisdiction commerce and its duties pursuant to section 66-1415.
Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature. Any money in the Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 32. Section 60-3,218, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,218 (1) There is hereby created the Nebraska Snowmobile Trail
Cash Fund into which shall be deposited the portion of the fees collected
from snowmobile registration as provided in section 60-3,217.
(2) The Game and Parks Commission shall use the money in the
Nebraska Snowmobile Trail Cash Fund for the operation, maintenance,
enforcement, planning, establishment, and marking of snowmobile trails
throughout the state and for the acquisition by purchase or lease of real
property to carry out the provisions of this section.
(3) The commission shall establish rules and regulations pertaining
-36-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
to the use and maintenance of snowmobile trails.
(4) Transfers may be made from the Nebraska Snowmobile Trail Cash
Fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money
in the Nebraska Snowmobile Trail Cash Fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(5) The State Treasurer shall transfer the unobligated June 30,
2017, balance in the Nebraska Snowmobile Trail Cash Fund to the General
Fund on or before July 31, 2017, on such date as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 33. Section 60-1409, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-1409 The Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Fund is
created. All fees collected under the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation
Act shall be remitted by the board, as collected, to the State Treasurer
for credit to the fund. Such fund shall be appropriated by the
Legislature for the operations of the Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry
Licensing Board and shall be paid out from time to time by warrants of
the Director of Administrative Services on the State Treasurer for
authorized expenditures upon duly itemized vouchers executed as provided
by law and approved by the chairperson of the board or the executive
secretary , except that transfers from the fund to the General Fund may
be made at the direction of the Legislature through June 30, 2018. The
expenses of conducting the office must always be kept within the income
collected and reported to the State Treasurer by such board. Such office
and expense thereof shall not be supported or paid from the General Fund,
and all money deposited in the Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing
Fund shall be expended only for such office and expense thereof and,
unless determined by the board, it shall not be required to expend any
funds to any person or any other governmental agency.
-37-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Any money in the Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act. The fund shall be audited by the Auditor of
Public Accounts at such time as he or she determines necessary.
The State Treasurer shall transfer five hundred thousand dollars
from the Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Fund to the General
Fund on or before June 30, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 34. Section 60-1505, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
60-1505 The Vehicle Title and Registration System Replacement and
Maintenance Cash Fund is hereby created. The fund shall be administered
by the Department of Motor Vehicles. Revenue credited to the fund shall
include fees collected by the department from participation in any
multistate electronic data security program, except as otherwise
specifically provided by law, and funds transferred as provided in
section 60-3,186. The fund shall be used by the department to pay for
costs associated with the acquisition, implementation, maintenance,
support, upgrades, and replacement of the Vehicle Title and Registration
System. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Vehicle Title and
Registration System Replacement and Maintenance Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from
investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 35. Section 60-1513, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
60-1513 The Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund is hereby
-38-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
created. The fund shall be administered by the Director of Motor
Vehicles. In addition to money paid to the department or credited or
remitted to the fund, the fund may also receive reimbursement from
counties. The fund shall be used by the Department of Motor Vehicles to
carry out its duties as deemed necessary by the Director of Motor
Vehicles, except that transfers from the fund to the General Fund, the
Operator's License Services System Replacement and Maintenance Fund , or
the Vehicle Title and Registration System Replacement and Maintenance
Cash Fund may be made at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in
the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of
money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 36. Section 61-210, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
61-210 The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment Cash Fund is
created. The State Treasurer shall credit to such fund such money as is
specifically appropriated or reappropriated by the Legislature. The State
Treasurer shall also credit such fund with payments, if any, accepted for
services rendered by the department, including the Chief Water Officer,
and fees collected pursuant to subsection (6) of section 46-606 and
section 61-209. The funds made available to the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment by the United States, through the Natural
Resources Conservation Service of the Department of Agriculture or
through any other agencies, shall be credited to the fund by the State
Treasurer. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The Department
of Water, Energy, and Environment shall allocate money from the fund to
pay costs of the programs or activities of the department, including the
-39-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
programs or activities of the Chief Water Officer. The Director of
Administrative Services, upon receipt of proper vouchers approved by the
department, shall issue warrants on the fund, and the State Treasurer
shall countersign and pay from, but never in excess of, the amounts to
the credit of the fund. Transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
Sec. 37. Section 61-224, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
61-224 There is hereby created the Critical Infrastructure
Facilities Cash Fund in the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.
The fund shall consist of funds appropriated or transferred by the
Legislature. The fund shall be used by the Department of Water, Energy,
and Environment (1) to provide a grant to a natural resources district to
offset costs related to soil and water improvements intended to protect
critical infrastructure facilities within the district which includes
military installations, transportation routes, and wastewater treatment
facilities, (2) to provide a grant to an irrigation district for
reimbursement of costs related to temporary repairs to the main canal and
tunnels of an interstate irrigation system which experienced a failure,
and (3) to provide a grant to an entity within a county with a population
exceeding one hundred thousand inhabitants formed pursuant to the
Interlocal Cooperation Act for the purpose of funding a portion of the
cost of a wastewater system. Any funds remaining after all such project
costs have been completely funded shall be transferred to the General
Fund. Transfers may be made from the Critical Infrastructure Facilities
Cash Fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Critical Infrastructure Facilities Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act, and any interest earned by the fund shall be credited to
the General Fund.
-40-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Sec. 38. Section 66-739, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
66-739 There is hereby created the Motor Fuel Tax Enforcement and
Collection Cash Fund. Such fund shall consist of appropriations to the
fund and money transferred to it pursuant to section 39-2215. The fund
shall be used exclusively for the costs of the Department of Revenue in
carrying out its duties under the Compressed Fuel Tax Act, the Petroleum
Release Remedial Action Act, the State Aeronautics Act, and sections
66-482 to 66-4,149, 66-501 to 66-531, and 66-712 to 66-736 and other
related costs for the Department of Agriculture and the Nebraska State
Patrol , except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General
Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Motor Fuel Tax
Enforcement and Collection Cash Fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 39. Section 66-1521, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
66-1521 (1) A petroleum release remedial action fee is hereby
imposed upon the producer, refiner, importer, distributor, wholesaler, or
supplier who engages in the sale, distribution, delivery, and use of
petroleum within this state, except that the fee shall not be imposed on
petroleum that is exported. The fee shall also be imposed on diesel fuel
which is indelibly dyed. The amount of the fee shall be nine-tenths of
one cent per gallon on motor vehicle fuel as defined in section 66-482
and three-tenths of one cent per gallon on diesel fuel as defined in
section 66-482. The amount of the fee shall be used first for payment of
claims approved by the State Claims Board pursuant to section 66-1531;
second, up to three million dollars of the fee per year shall be used for
reimbursement of owners and operators under the Petroleum Release
Remedial Action Act for investigations of releases ordered pursuant to
section 81-15,124; and third, the remainder of the fee shall be used for
-41-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
any other purpose authorized by section 66-1519. The fee shall be paid by
all producers, refiners, importers, distributors, wholesalers, and
suppliers subject to the fee by filing a monthly return on or before the
twentieth day of the calendar month following the monthly period to which
it relates. The pertinent provisions, specifically including penalty
provisions, of the motor fuel laws as defined in section 66-712 shall
apply to the administration and collection of the fee except for the
treatment given refunds. There shall be a refund allowed on any fee paid
on petroleum which was taxed and then exported, destroyed, or purchased
for use by the United States Government or its agencies. The department
may also adjust for all errors in the payment of the fee. In each
calendar year, no claim for refund related to the fee can be for an
amount less than ten dollars.
(2) No producer, refiner, importer, distributor, wholesaler, or
supplier shall engage in the sale, distribution, delivery, or use of
petroleum in this state without having first obtained a petroleum release
remedial action license. Application for a license shall be made to the
Department of Revenue upon a form prepared and furnished by the
Department of Revenue. If the applicant is an individual, the application
shall include the applicant's social security number. Failure to obtain a
license prior to engaging in the sale, distribution, delivery, or use of
petroleum shall be a Class IV misdemeanor. The Department of Revenue may
suspend or cancel the license of any producer, refiner, importer,
distributor, wholesaler, or supplier who fails to pay the fee imposed by
subsection (1) of this section in the same manner as licenses are
suspended or canceled pursuant to section 66-720.
(3) The Department of Revenue may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to carry out this section.
(4) The Department of Revenue shall deduct and withhold from the
petroleum release remedial action fee collected pursuant to this section
an amount sufficient to reimburse the direct costs of collecting and
-42-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
administering the petroleum release remedial action fee. Such costs shall
not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars for each fiscal year. The
one hundred fifty thousand dollars shall be prorated, based on the number
of months the fee is collected, whenever the fee is collected for only a
portion of a year. The amount deducted and withheld for costs shall be
deposited in the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Collection Fund which
is hereby created. The Petroleum Release Remedial Action Collection Fund
shall be appropriated to the Department of Revenue , except that
transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature. Any money in the Petroleum Release Remedial Action
Collection Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(5) The Department of Revenue shall collect the fee imposed by
subsection (1) of this section.
Sec. 40. Section 66-1842, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
66-1842 The Public Service Commission Regulation Fund is created.
Transfers may be made from the Public Service Commission Regulation Fund
to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The commission
shall remit all money received by or for it in payment of the fees or
assessments imposed by the State Natural Gas Regulation Act to the State
Treasurer for credit to the fund. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 41. Section 69-1317, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
69-1317 (a)(1)(i) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision,
all funds received under the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property
Act, including the proceeds from the sale of abandoned property under
-43-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
section 69-1316, shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into the
Unclaimed Property Trust Fund from which he or she shall make prompt
payment of claims allowed pursuant to the act and payment of any expenses
related to unclaimed property. All funds received under section
69-1307.05 shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into the Unclaimed
Property Trust Fund from which he or she shall make prompt payment of
claims regarding such funds allowed pursuant to the act. Transfers from
the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund to the General Fund may be made at the
direction of the Legislature. Before making the deposit he or she shall
record the name and last-known address of each person appearing from the
holders' reports to be entitled to the abandoned property, the name and
last-known address of each insured person or annuitant, and with respect
to each policy or contract listed in the report of a life insurance
corporation, its number, the name of the corporation, and the amount due.
The record shall be available for public inspection during business
hours.
(ii) The record shall not be subject to public inspection or
available for copying, reproduction, or scrutiny by commercial or
professional locators of property presumed abandoned who charge any
service. A finders' fee cannot be charged by commercial or professional
locators of property presumed abandoned until twenty-four months after
the names from the holders' reports have been published or officially
disclosed. Records concerning the social security number, date of birth,
and last-known address of an owner shall be treated as confidential and
subject to the same confidentiality as tax return information held by the
Department of Revenue, except that the Auditor of Public Accounts shall
have unrestricted access to such records.
(iii) A professional finders' fee shall be limited to ten percent of
the total dollar amount of the property presumed abandoned. To claim any
such fee, the finder shall disclose to the owner the nature, location,
and value of the property, provide notice of when such property was
-44-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
reported to the State Treasurer, and provide notice that the property may
be claimed by the owner from the State Treasurer free of charge. To claim
any such fee if the property has not yet been abandoned, the finder shall
disclose to the owner the nature, location, and value of the property,
provide notice of when such property will be reported to the State
Treasurer, if known, and provide notice that, upon receipt of the
property by the State Treasurer, such property may be claimed by the
owner from the State Treasurer free of charge.
(2)(i) The unclaimed property records of the State Treasurer, the
unclaimed property reports of holders, and the information derived by an
unclaimed property examination or audit of the records of a person or
otherwise obtained by or communicated to the State Treasurer may be
withheld from the public. Any record or information that may be withheld
under the laws of this state or of the United States when in the
possession of such a person may be withheld when revealed or delivered to
the State Treasurer. Any record or information that is withheld under any
law of another state when in the possession of that other state may be
withheld when revealed or delivered by the other state to the State
Treasurer.
(ii) Information withheld from the general public concerning any
aspect of unclaimed property shall only be disclosed to an apparent owner
of the property or to the escheat, unclaimed, or abandoned property
administrators or officials of another state if that other state accords
substantially reciprocal privileges to the State Treasurer.
(b)(1) On or before November 1 of each year prior to 2026, the State
Treasurer shall transfer any balance in excess of one million dollars
from the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund to the permanent school fund.
(2) On or before November 1 of each year beginning in 2026 through
2035, the State Treasurer shall transfer any balance in excess of one
million dollars from the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund as follows:
(i) The first one million dollars to the Capitol Restoration Cash
-45-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Fund; and
(ii) Any remaining balance to the permanent school fund.
(3) On or before November 1 of each year beginning in 2036, the
State Treasurer shall transfer any balance in excess of one million
dollars from the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund to the permanent school
fund.
(c) Before making any deposit to the credit of the permanent school
fund, the Capitol Restoration Cash Fund, or the General Fund, the State
Treasurer may deduct any costs related to unclaimed property and place
such funds in the Unclaimed Property Cash Fund.
(d) The Unclaimed Property Cash Fund is created. Transfers from the
fund to the General Fund may be made at the direction of the Legislature.
Any money in the Unclaimed Property Cash Fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
Sec. 42. Section 70-1020, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
70-1020 In order to defray the expenses of the Nebraska Power Review
Board, there shall be imposed upon each public power district, public
power and irrigation district, electric membership association, electric
cooperative company, and municipality having an electric distribution
system or generation and distribution system, and also upon all
registered groups of municipalities, an assessment each fiscal year in
such sum as shall be determined by the board and approved by the
Governor. The total of such assessments shall not exceed the expenses of
the board which may reasonably be anticipated for the fiscal year for
which assessment is made and shall be apportioned among the various
agencies in proportion to their gross income in the preceding calendar
year. The board shall determine and certify such assessment to each
supplier after approval of the board's budget by the Legislature and
-46-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Governor. The supplier shall remit the amount of its assessment to the
board within forty-five days after the mailing of the assessment. Any
assessment not paid when due shall draw interest at a rate equal to the
rate of interest allowed per annum under section 45-104.02, as such rate
may from time to time be adjusted. The proceeds of such assessment shall
be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Power
Review Fund, which fund is hereby created and which, when appropriated by
the Legislature, shall be used to administer the powers granted to the
Nebraska Power Review Board , except that transfers may be made from the
fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money
in the Nebraska Power Review Fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 43. Section 71-222.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-222.02 All funds collected in the administration of the Barber
Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Board of
Barber Examiners Fund which is hereby created and which shall be expended
only for the administration of the act , except that transfers may be
made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the Board of Barber Examiners Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 44. Section 71-4732, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-4732 There is hereby created a Commission for the Deaf and Hard
of Hearing Fund to consist of such funds as the Legislature shall
appropriate, any funds received under sections 20-156 and 71-4731, and
any fees collected for interpreter services as provided in section
71-4728. The fund shall be used to administer sections 20-156 and 71-4720
-47-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
to 71-4732.01, except that (1) money in the fund from fees collected for
interpreter services shall be used only for expenses related to the
provision of such services and , (2) money in the fund may only be used
to provide services pursuant to section 71-4728.04 if there is no money
in the Telehealth System Fund , and (3) transfers may be made from the
Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing Fund to the General Fund at
the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Commission for the
Deaf and Hard of Hearing Fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 45. Section 71-5328, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-5328 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and
Environment;
(b) Metropolitan utilities district means a district created
pursuant to section 14-2101; and
(c) Qualified labor training organization means any job training
service provider headquartered in the State of Nebraska with a
demonstrated history of providing workforce training relevant to the
skilled labor necessary for the removal and replacement of lead service
lines.
(2) The Lead Service Line Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be
administered by the department. The fund shall consist of funds
transferred by the Legislature. The fund shall be used for grants under
subsection (3) of this section. Transfers may be made from the fund to
the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Lead Service Line Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(3) The department shall utilize all money in the Lead Service Line
-48-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Cash Fund for the purpose of providing grants to metropolitan utilities
districts for the following:
(a) Removing and replacing lead service lines;
(b) Repaying debt incurred for any loan received by the metropolitan
utilities district for the purpose of replacing lead service lines,
including any loan or loans under the federal Drinking Water State
Revolving Fund or any other loan incurred specifically for the purpose of
removing lead service lines;
(c) Providing information to residents on the benefits of removing
lead service lines;
(d) Performing necessary construction, assessment, mapping, or any
other labor, management, or contracted services required for and
associated with removing and replacing lead service lines; or
(e) Acquiring any equipment, materials, or supplies necessary to
replace lead service lines.
(4) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section.
Sec. 46. Section 71-5661, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-5661 (1) The financial incentives provided by the Rural Health
Systems and Professional Incentive Act shall consist of (a) student loans
to eligible students for attendance at an eligible school as determined
pursuant to section 71-5662, (b) the repayment of qualified educational
debts owed by physicians and psychiatrists in an approved medical
specialty residency program in Nebraska as determined pursuant to section
71-5662, and (c) the repayment of qualified educational debts owed by
eligible health professionals as determined pursuant to section 71-5662.
Funds for such incentives shall be appropriated from the General Fund to
the department for such purposes.
(2) The Rural Health Professional Incentive Fund is created. The
fund shall be used to carry out the purposes of the act , except that
-49-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature. Money credited pursuant to section 71-5670.01 and
payments received pursuant to sections 71-5666, 71-5668, and 71-5669.01
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Rural Health
Professional Incentive Fund. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 47. Section 71-8612, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-8612 The Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired Cash Fund
is created. The fund shall contain money received pursuant to the
Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired Act and shall include a
percentage of the net proceeds derived from the operation of vending
facilities. The net proceeds from the operation of vending facilities
shall accrue to the blind vending facility operator, except for the
percentage of the net proceeds that shall revert to the cash fund. Such
fund shall be used for supervision and other administrative purposes as
necessary , except that transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The commission, in
consultation with the Committee of Blind Vendors, shall determine the
percentage of the net proceeds that reverts to the Commission for the
Blind and Visually Impaired Cash Fund after an investigation to reveal
the gross proceeds, cost of operation, amount necessary to replenish the
stock of merchandise, and the business needs of the blind vending
facility operator. All equipment purchased from the fund is the property
of the state and shall be disposed of only by sale at a fair market
price. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 48. Section 72-816, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-50-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
amended to read:
72-816 (1) The Vacant Building and Excess Land Cash Fund is created.
The fund shall consist of proceeds credited to the fund pursuant to
sections 72-815 and 90-268. Except as provided in sections 90-268 and
90-269, the fund shall be used to pay for the maintenance of vacant state
buildings and excess state land and for expenses related to the disposal
of state buildings and land referred to the Department of Administrative
Services by the committee pursuant to sections 72-811 to 72-818. The fund
shall be administered by the state building division of the Department of
Administrative Services. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
Funds may be transferred from the Vacant Building and Excess Land
Cash Fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
(2) If there are insufficient funds in the fund to enable the
division to fully implement the orders of the committee issued pursuant
to sections 72-811 to 72-818, the division shall implement them in the
order which most efficiently meets the purposes of such sections.
(3) Funds appropriated to the Task Force for Building Renewal shall
not be used to carry out any of the purposes of such sections (a) unless
the building would otherwise qualify for the use of such funds pursuant
to the Deferred Building Renewal Act and (b) except for any expenses
incurred by the administrator of the Task Force for Building Renewal in
fulfilling his or her duties under such sections.
Sec. 49. Section 72-2211, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
72-2211 (1) The Capitol Restoration Cash Fund is created. The
administrator shall administer the fund, which shall consist of money
received from the sale of material, rental revenue, private donations,
public donations, and transfers as directed by the Legislature from the
-51-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Capitol Preservation, Restoration, and Enhancement Endowment Fund, the
Unclaimed Property Trust Fund, and the Nebraska Capital Construction
Fund.
(2)(a) The Capitol Restoration Cash Fund shall be used to finance
projects for the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of the State
Capitol and its courtyards and grounds, to purchase and conserve items to
be added to the Nebraska Capitol Collections housed in the State Capitol,
to produce promotional material concerning the State Capitol, its
grounds, and the Nebraska State Capitol Environs District, and to pay the
expenditures for a project manager for the Capitol Heating, Ventilation,
and Air Conditioning Systems Replacement Project until such time as the
project is completed , except that transfers may be made from the fund to
the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Such expenditures
shall be prescribed by the administrator and approved by the commission.
(b) Money transferred to the fund from the Capitol Preservation,
Restoration, and Enhancement Endowment Fund shall only be used for the
restoration, preservation, and enhancement of the courtyards located at
the State Capitol.
(3) Any money in the Capitol Restoration Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 50. Section 75-159, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
75-159 (1) The Public Service Commission Housing and Recreational
Vehicle Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of fees collected
under the Nebraska Uniform Standards for Modular Housing Units Act and
fees collected pursuant to the Uniform Standard Code for Manufactured
Homes and Recreational Vehicles.
(2) Money credited to the fund shall be used by the Public Service
Commission for the purposes of administering the Nebraska Uniform
-52-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Standards for Modular Housing Units Act and the Uniform Standard Code for
Manufactured Homes and Recreational Vehicles.
(3) Transfers from the fund to the General Fund may be made at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Public Service Commission
Housing and Recreational Vehicle Cash Fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(4) On July 1, 2010, the State Treasurer shall transfer any money in
the Modular Housing Units Cash Fund and any money in the Manufactured
Homes and Recreational Vehicles Cash Fund to the Public Service
Commission Housing and Recreational Vehicle Cash Fund.
Sec. 51. Section 75-1101, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
75-1101 (1) For purposes of this section, 211 Information and
Referral Network means a statewide information and referral network
providing information to the public regarding disaster and emergency
response and health and human services provided by public and private
entities throughout the state.
(2) The Public Service Commission shall award a grant annually to a
211 Information and Referral Network which submits an application and
meets the requirements of this section.
(3) To be eligible for a grant, the 211 Information and Referral
Network shall update the information and referral services on the network
at least annually, shall geographically index the services to provide
information on a county-by-county basis, and shall be accredited as
meeting the standards for service delivery and quality by the Alliance of
Information and Referral Systems or a similar organization approved by
the commission.
(4) The grant may be used to establish a website which includes
links to providers of health and human services, the name, address, and
telephone number of any organization listed on the website, a description
-53-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
of the type of services provided by the organization, and other
information to educate the public about the health and human services
available on a geographic basis. The grant may also be used to provide
access to the network twenty-four hours per day, seven days per week,
through telephone access and website access.
(5) There is hereby created the 211 Cash Fund. The fund shall be
used solely for the purpose of providing grants pursuant to this section
and associated administrative costs , except that transfers may be made
from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
All money received by the Public Service Commission for such grants shall
be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the 211 Cash Fund. Any
money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 52. Section 76-549, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-549 (1) All fees collected pursuant to the Abstracters Act shall
be deposited in the state treasury to be credited to the Abstracters
Board of Examiners Cash Fund which is hereby created. All actual and
necessary expenses of the board shall be paid from such fund.
(2) No member of the board shall receive a salary. Each member of
the board shall receive as compensation for each day or part thereof of
actual service while attending meetings or otherwise engaged upon the
business of the board fifty dollars and expenses incurred in the
performance of official duties. The director shall be paid a salary to be
determined by the board.
(3) Transfers may be made from the Abstracters Board of Examiners
Cash Fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Abstracters Board of Examiners Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
-54-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Investment Act.
Sec. 53. Section 76-3219, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
76-3219 The board shall collect all fees and other revenue pursuant
to the Nebraska Appraisal Management Company Registration Act and shall
remit such fees and revenue to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Appraisal Management Company Fund, which is hereby created. The fund
shall be used to implement, administer, and enforce the act , except that
transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature. Any money in the Appraisal Management Company Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 54. Section 77-3,110, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-3,110 (1) All funds received pursuant to sections 77-3,109 and
77-3,118 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Department of Revenue Miscellaneous Receipts Fund which is hereby
created.
(2) All money in the Department of Revenue Miscellaneous Receipts
Fund shall be administered by the Department of Revenue and shall be used
to defray the cost of production of the publications listed in section
77-3,109 or of the listings described in section 77-3,118 and to carry
out any administrative responsibilities of the department.
(3) Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Department of Revenue
Miscellaneous Receipts Fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 55. Section 77-1342, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-55-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
77-1342 There is hereby created a fund to be known as the Department
of Revenue Property Assessment Division Cash Fund to which shall be
credited all money received by the Department of Revenue for services
performed for county and multicounty assessment districts, for charges
for publications, manuals, and lists, as an assessor's examination fee
authorized by section 77-421, and under the provisions of sections
60-3,202, 77-684, and 77-1250. The fund shall be used to carry out any
duties and responsibilities of the department , except that transfers may
be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. The county or multicounty assessment district shall be
billed by the department for services rendered. Reimbursements to the
department shall be credited to the Department of Revenue Property
Assessment Division Cash Fund, and expenditures therefrom shall be made
only when such funds are available. The department shall only bill for
the actual amount expended in performing the service.
The fund shall not, at the close of each year, be lapsed to the
General Fund. Any money in the Department of Revenue Property Assessment
Division Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 56. Section 77-2911, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-2911 The Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Fund
is created. The fund shall be administered by the Nebraska State
Historical Society and shall consist of all fees credited to the fund
pursuant to section 77-2907. The fund shall be used to administer and
enforce the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act.
Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
-56-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 57. Section 77-4025, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-4025 (1) There is hereby created a cash fund in the Department of
Revenue to be known as the Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund. All
revenue collected or received by the Tax Commissioner from the license
fees, certification fees, and taxes imposed by the Tobacco Products Tax
Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Tobacco
Products Administration Cash Fund, except that all such revenue relating
to electronic nicotine delivery systems shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.
(2) All costs required for administration of the Tobacco Products
Tax Act shall be paid from the Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund.
Credits and refunds allowed under the act shall be paid from the Tobacco
Products Administration Cash Fund. Any receipts, after credits and
refunds, in excess of the amounts sufficient to cover the costs of
administration may be transferred to the General Fund at the direction of
the Legislature.
(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer nine million five hundred
thousand dollars from the Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund to
the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but on or before June 30,
2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer nine million five hundred
thousand dollars from the Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund to
the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but on or before June 30,
2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer nine million dollars from
the Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund to the General Fund on or
after July 1, 2027, but on or before June 30, 2028, on such dates and in
-57-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services. The State
Treasurer shall transfer nine million dollars from the Tobacco Products
Administration Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2028,
but on or before June 30, 2029, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(4) Any money in the Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 58. Section 77-4310.03, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-4310.03 There is hereby created the Marijuana and Controlled
Substances Tax Administration Cash Fund. Money in the fund shall be used
by the Tax Commissioner for the purposes of administering, collecting,
and enforcing the tax imposed by section 77-4303, except that transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund or the Department of
Revenue Property Assessment Division Cash Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the Marijuana and Controlled Substances Tax
Administration Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 59. Section 77-5031, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-5031 The Tax Equalization and Review Commission Cash Fund is
hereby created. All money received by the commission for appeals and
services performed and billed to other agencies or persons shall be
credited to the fund. The commission shall only bill for the actual
amount expended in performing services. The fund shall be used to carry
out the provisions of the Tax Equalization and Review Commission Act ,
-58-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at
the direction of the Legislature. Expenditures from the Tax Equalization
and Review Commission Cash Fund shall be made only when such funds are
available. Any unexpended balance in the fund at the end of each fiscal
year shall not lapse to the General Fund. Any money in the Tax
Equalization and Review Commission Cash Fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
Sec. 60. Section 77-5601, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-5601 (1) From August 1, 2004, through October 31, 2004, there
shall be conducted a tax amnesty program with regard to taxes due and
owing that have not been reported to the Department of Revenue. Any
person applying for tax amnesty shall pay all unreported taxes that were
due on or before April 1, 2004. Any person that applies for tax amnesty
and is accepted by the Tax Commissioner shall have any penalties and
interest waived on unreported and delinquent taxes notwithstanding any
other provisions of law to the contrary.
(2) To be eligible for the tax amnesty provided by this section, the
person shall apply for amnesty within the amnesty period, file a return
for each taxable period for which the amnesty is requested by December
31, 2004, if no return has been filed, and pay in full all taxes for
which amnesty is sought with the return or within thirty days after the
application if a return was filed prior to the amnesty period. Tax
amnesty shall not be available for any person that is under civil or
criminal audit, investigation, or prosecution for unreported or
delinquent taxes by this state or the United States Government on or
before April 16, 2004.
(3) The department shall not seek civil or criminal prosecution
against any person for any taxable period for which amnesty has been
-59-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
granted. The Tax Commissioner shall develop forms for applying for the
tax amnesty program, develop procedures for qualification for tax
amnesty, and conduct a public awareness campaign publicizing the program.
(4) If a person elects to participate in the amnesty program, the
election shall constitute an express and irrevocable relinquishment of
all administrative and judicial rights to challenge the imposition of the
tax or its amount. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the department
from adjusting a return as a result of any state or federal audit.
(5)(a) Except for any local option sales tax collected and returned
to the appropriate municipality and any motor vehicle fuel, diesel fuel,
and compressed fuel taxes, which shall be deposited in the Highway Trust
Fund or Highway Allocation Fund as provided by law, no less than eighty
percent of all revenue received pursuant to the tax amnesty program shall
be deposited in the General Fund and ten percent, not to exceed five
hundred thousand dollars, shall be deposited in the Department of Revenue
Enforcement Fund. Any amount that would otherwise be deposited in the
Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund that is in excess of the five-
hundred-thousand-dollar limitation shall be deposited in the General
Fund.
(b) For fiscal year 2005-06, all proceeds in the Department of
Revenue Enforcement Fund shall be appropriated to the department for
purposes of employing investigators, agents, and auditors and otherwise
increasing personnel for enforcement of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.
(c) For fiscal years after fiscal year 2005-06, twenty percent of
all proceeds received during the previous calendar year due to the
efforts of auditors and investigators hired pursuant to subdivision (5)
(b) of this section, not to exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars,
shall be deposited in the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund for
purposes of employing investigators and auditors or continuing such
employment for purposes of increasing enforcement of the act.
(d) Ten percent of all proceeds received during each calendar year
-60-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
due to the contracts entered into pursuant to section 77-367 shall be
deposited in the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund for purposes of
identifying nonfilers of returns, underreporters, nonpayers of taxes, and
improper or fraudulent payments.
(6)(a) The department shall prepare a report by April 1, 2005, and
by February 1 of each year thereafter detailing the results of the tax
amnesty program and the subsequent enforcement efforts. For the report
due April 1, 2005, the report shall include (i) the amount of revenue
obtained as a result of the tax amnesty program broken down by tax
program, (ii) the amount obtained from instate taxpayers and from out-of-
state taxpayers, and (iii) the amount obtained from individual taxpayers
and from business enterprises.
(b) For reports due in subsequent years, the report shall include
(i) the number of personnel hired for purposes of subdivision (5)(b) of
this section and their duties, (ii) a description of lists, software,
programming, computer equipment, and other technological methods acquired
and the purposes of each, and (iii) the amount of new revenue obtained as
a result of the new personnel and acquisitions during the prior calendar
year, broken down into the same categories as described in subdivision
(6)(a) of this section.
(7) The Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund is created. Transfers
may be made from the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The Department of
Revenue Enforcement Fund may receive transfers from the Civic and
Community Center Financing Fund at the direction of the Legislature for
the purpose of administering the Sports Arena Facility Financing
Assistance Act. The Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund shall include
any money credited to the fund (a) under section 77-2703, and such money
shall be used by the Department of Revenue to defray the costs incurred
to implement Laws 2019, LB237, (b) under the Mechanical Amusement Device
Tax Act, and such money shall be used by the department to defray the
-61-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
costs incurred to implement and enforce Laws 2019, LB538, and any rules
and regulations adopted and promulgated to carry out Laws 2019, LB538,
(c) under section 77-2906, and such money shall be used by the Department
of Revenue to defray the costs incurred to implement Laws 2020, LB310,
(d) under the Kratom Consumer Protection Act, and such money shall be
used by the Department of Revenue to defray the costs incurred to
administer the act, and (e) under section 77-3,124. Any money in the
Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning
October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the
fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
(8) For purposes of this section, taxes mean any taxes collected by
the department, including, but not limited to state and local sales and
use taxes, individual and corporate income taxes, financial institutions
deposit taxes, motor vehicle fuel, diesel fuel, and compressed fuel
taxes, cigarette taxes, transfer taxes, and charitable gaming taxes.
Sec. 61. Section 79-1064, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
79-1064 The State Department of Education Cash Fund is created.
Except as to other revenue the disposition of which is otherwise provided
for, all sums of money received by the State Department of Education from
the sale of goods and materiel, fees from any training program or
services rendered, and any revenue such department may receive from any
other source shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
State Department of Education Cash Fund. The State Treasurer shall
disburse such amounts in the fund as are available and considered
incident to the administration and operation of the State Department of
Education. Money in the State Department of Education Cash Fund may be
transferred to the General Fund or the Education Future Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. All disbursements for the State Department
-62-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
of Education Cash Fund shall be made upon vouchers issued by the State
Department of Education and warrants drawn by the Director of
Administrative Services. Any money in the State Department of Education
Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 62. Section 81-179, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-179 (1) There is hereby created under the control of the
Governor, for allocation to building renewal projects of the various
agencies, a fund to be known as the Building Renewal Allocation Fund. The
fund shall contain the revenue from the special privilege tax as provided
in section 77-2602 and such other money as is appropriated by the
Legislature. Such appropriation is declared to consist of building
renewal funds which shall be kept separate and distinct from the program
continuation funds and project construction funds. Transfers may be made
from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
(2) Separate subfunds, subprograms, projects, or accounts shall be
established to separately account for any expenditures on state buildings
or facilities to comply with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act
of 1990. A minimal amount of the funds contained in the subfunds,
subprograms, projects, or accounts may be used for planning and
evaluation of buildings and facilities.
(3) The budget division of the Department of Administrative Services
may administratively transfer funds to appropriate accounting entities to
correctly account for the operating expenditures. A separate fund, cash
fund, project, or other account may be administratively established for
such purpose.
(4) Any money in the Building Renewal Allocation Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
-63-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from
investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 63. Section 81-201.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-201.05 (1) The Weed Book Cash Fund is created. On July 1, 2005,
July 1, 2006, July 1, 2007, July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, if there are
sufficient funds available, twenty-five thousand dollars shall be
transferred from the Weed Book Cash Fund to the Noxious Weed Cash Fund.
Transfers may be made from the Weed Book Cash Fund to the General Fund at
the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Weed Book Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The sale price of each Weeds of the Great Plains book sold by
the Department of Agriculture shall be credited as follows:
(a) Seventy-five percent to the Weed Book Cash Fund to aid in
defraying the cost of publishing, preparing, and distributing such books
and any supplemental inserts to such books; and
(b) Twenty-five percent to the Noxious Weed Cash Fund.
Sec. 64. Section 81-2,147.11, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-2,147.11 There is hereby created a fund to be known as the
Nebraska Seed Administrative Cash Fund. All money received pursuant to
the Nebraska Seed Law shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit
to such fund. All money credited to the fund shall be used by the
Department of Agriculture to aid in defraying the cost of administering
such law , except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General
Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska Seed
Administrative Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
-64-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Sec. 65. Section 81-2,162.27, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-2,162.27 (1) All money received under the Nebraska Commercial
Fertilizer and Soil Conditioner Act and the Agricultural Liming Materials
Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Fertilizers and Soil Conditioners Administrative Fund, which fund is
hereby created. Money so received shall be used by the department for
defraying the expenses of administering the Nebraska Commercial
Fertilizer and Soil Conditioner Act and the Agricultural Liming Materials
Act. The fund may also be used to defray costs incurred by the department
directly related to administrative and budgetary support of the Healthy
Soils Task Force pursuant to sections 2-401 to 2-404, except that no more
than ten thousand dollars may be expended by the department from the fund
for such purpose. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund
at the direction of the Legislature. The State Treasurer shall transfer
two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars from the Fertilizers and Soil
Conditioners Administrative Fund to the General Fund on or before June
30, 2019, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(2) Any unexpended balance in the Fertilizers and Soil Conditioners
Administrative Fund at the close of any biennium shall, when
reappropriated, be available for the uses and purposes of the fund for
the succeeding biennium. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
Sec. 66. Section 81-2,291, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2,291 All fees paid to the department in accordance with the
Nebraska Pure Food Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer. The
-65-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
State Treasurer shall credit the fees to the Pure Food Cash Fund, which
fund is hereby created. All money credited to such fund shall be
appropriated to the uses of the department to aid in defraying the
expenses of administering the act , except that transfers may be made
from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
Any money in the Pure Food Cash Fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 67. Section 81-302, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-302 The Department of Banking and Finance Settlement Cash Fund is
created. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Banking and
Finance. The fund shall consist of money received by the state in
settlements resulting from regulatory or judicial resolution of
financial, securities, or consumer issues in which the department is
designated as a recipient and any investment income earned on the fund.
The Department of Administrative Services may for accounting purposes
create subfunds of the fund to segregate awards or allocations received
pursuant to different orders or settlements. The fund may be used by the
Department of Banking and Finance for any allowable legal purposes as
determined by the Director of Banking and Finance. Transfers may be made
from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
Any money in the Department of Banking and Finance Settlement Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 68. Section 81-406, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-406 The Contractor and Professional Employer Organization
Registration Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the
Department of Labor and shall consist of fees collected by the department
-66-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
pursuant to the Farm Labor Contractors Act, the Contractor Registration
Act, and the Professional Employer Organization Registration Act and such
sums as are appropriated to the fund by the Legislature. The fund shall
be used for enforcing and administering the Farm Labor Contractors Act,
the Contractor Registration Act, the Employee Classification Act, and the
Professional Employer Organization Registration Act. Any money in the
fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act. Money in the Contractor and Professional
Employer Organization Registration Cash Fund may be transferred to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
The State Treasurer shall transfer one million seven hundred
thousand dollars from the Contractor and Professional Employer
Organization Registration Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June
15, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 69. Section 81-407, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-407 (1) The Workforce Development Program Cash Fund is hereby
created. The fund shall consist of transfers authorized by the
Legislature.
(2) The Department of Labor shall administer the fund. The fund may
be used:
(a) To provide workforce development grants;
(b) To pay the costs of administering the workforce development
grant program;
(c) To pay the costs of establishing, assessing, collecting, and
maintaining state unemployment insurance tax liability and payments;
(d) To pay unemployment benefits if determined necessary by the
Commissioner of Labor;
-67-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
(e) To provide labor availability, skills gap, and workforce
development studies and reports by the Department of Labor; and
(f) For purposes of the Manufacturing Modernization and Workforce
Development Pilot Investment Act.
(3) Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund or the
Nebraska Opportunity Grant Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Workforce Development Program Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
(4)(a) As part of the workforce development grant program described
in subdivision (2)(a) of this section, the Nebraska Workforce Development
Board shall submit grant proposals to the Commissioner of Labor for the
commissioner's consideration. The board's proposals shall be submitted by
April 30 of each year and shall set forth strategies and initiatives
designed to develop the workforce in the state. Each such proposal shall:
(i) Include a description of the purpose of the proposed grant and
the desired outcome; and
(ii) Include a method of measuring success for the proposed grant.
(b) The board may submit up to eighteen grant proposals per calendar
year.
(c) The commissioner may approve, reject, or modify any grant
proposal submitted by the board. In the case of a rejection or
modification of any grant proposal, the commissioner shall provide
written notice of the decision to the board and include the rationale for
the rejection or modification.
(d) The commissioner shall have the discretion to approve up to
three grant proposals per calendar year without the prior approval of the
board. If the total of the three proposals exceeds twenty-five percent of
the unobligated beginning annual balance of the Workforce Development
Program Cash Fund, the commissioner shall submit a report detailing the
-68-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
proposals to the board and to the chairperson of the Appropriations
Committee of the Legislature within ninety days after approving such
proposals.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, Nebraska Workforce Development
Board means the state workforce development board authorized by the
federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and established in
Nebraska.
Sec. 70. Section 81-528, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-528 (1) The State Fire Marshal Cash Fund is created. Money
collected pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The fund shall be
used to pay for costs incurred in the general operations program of the
State Fire Marshal's office , except that transfers may be made from the
fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The State
Fire Marshal Cash Fund shall be administered by the State Fire Marshal.
Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) All money received from inspection contracts, penalties, fees,
or forfeitures, except fines collected under sections 81-501.01 to 81-531
and 81-5,151 to 81-5,157, shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the fund.
(3) All fees assessed pursuant to section 81-505.01 for services
performed by the State Fire Marshal's office shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the fund.
Sec. 71. Section 81-530, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-530 The Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund is created. All fees
collected by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to the Nebraska Amusement
Ride Act and the Conveyance Safety Act shall be remitted to the State
-69-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Treasurer for credit to the Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund. Fees so
collected shall be used for administering the provisions of the Nebraska
Amusement Ride Act and the Conveyance Safety Act. Any money in the
Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Money in the
Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund may be transferred to the General Fund
at the direction of the Legislature.
Sec. 72. Section 81-5,153, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-5,153 (1) The Training Division Cash Fund is created. The State
Fire Marshal shall administer the fund.
(2) Money collected pursuant to section 81-5,152 shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. Such money in the fund
shall be used for the purpose of administering the training program
established pursuant to sections 81-5,151 to 81-5,157 , except that
transfers may be made from such money in the fund to the General Fund at
the direction of the Legislature.
(3) Money transferred to the Training Division Cash Fund from the
Nebraska Opioid Recovery Trust Fund shall be used to connect first
responders to behavioral health services, supports, and training and for
a statewide wellness learning plan that includes anonymous assessments,
education, and awareness to promote resiliency development, in accordance
with the terms and conditions of the litigation or settlement that is the
source of the money.
(4) Any money in the Training Division Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 73. Section 81-5,180, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-70-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
81-5,180 The Boiler Inspection Cash Fund is created. The State Fire
Marshal shall use the fund for the administration of the boiler
inspection program pursuant to the Boiler Inspection Act. The fund shall
consist of money appropriated to it by the Legislature and fees collected
in the administration of the act. Fees so collected shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer with an itemized statement showing the source of
collection. The State Treasurer shall credit the fees to the fund and the
money in the fund shall not lapse into the General Fund , except that
money in the Boiler Inspection Cash Fund may be transferred to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Boiler
Inspection Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 74. Section 81-829.33, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-829.33 The Governor's Emergency Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall consist of federal reimbursements received by the state for
eligible state administrative costs incurred by the Nebraska Emergency
Management Agency for administering federal emergency disaster
declarations and revenue from all other nonfederal government sources.
Except as provided in section 90-270, the fund shall be used to pay
eligible costs related to state emergency disaster declarations. The fund
shall be administered by the State Administrator of the Nebraska
Emergency Management Agency. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from
investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Transfers may be made from the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund to the
Cash Reserve Fund and General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
The State Treasurer shall transfer zero dollars from the Governor's
-71-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Emergency Cash Fund to the Cash Reserve Fund by June 30, 2023, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 75. Section 81-8,110.07, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-8,110.07 The secretary of the examining board shall receive and
account for all money derived from the operation of the Land Surveyors
Regulation Act and shall remit it to the State Treasurer for credit to
the Land Surveyor Examiner's Fund, which fund is hereby created. This
fund shall be continued from year to year. When appropriated by the
Legislature, this fund shall be expended only for the purposes of the
Land Surveyors Regulation Act. When not reappropriated for the succeeding
biennium, the money in this fund shall not revert to the General Fund.
The fund shall be paid out only upon vouchers approved by the examining
board and upon warrants issued by the Director of Administrative Services
and countersigned by the State Treasurer. The expenditures of the
examining board shall be kept within the income collected and remitted to
the State Treasurer by the examining board. Transfers may be made from
the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Land Surveyor Examiner's Fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 76. Section 81-8,129.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-8,129.01 There is hereby created a fund, to be known as the State
Athletic Commissioner's Cash Fund, from which shall be appropriated such
amounts as are available and as shall be considered incident to the
administration of the State Athletic Commissioner's office. Money in the
State Athletic Commissioner's Cash Fund may be transferred to the General
Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The fund shall contain all
license fees and gross receipts taxes collected by the commissioner as
-72-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
provided under sections 81-8,128 to 81-8,142.01, which shall be paid into
the state treasury and the State Treasurer shall credit the money to the
State Athletic Commissioner's Cash Fund.
Sec. 77. Section 81-8,194, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,194 (1) The board shall establish fees of no more than three
hundred dollars for applications and initial certificates of licensure
and annual renewals for services related to the Professional Landscape
Architects Act based on the administration costs incurred by the board.
The board shall collect, account for, and remit such fees to the State
Treasurer for credit to the State Board of Landscape Architects Cash Fund
which is hereby created. All fees are nonrefundable.
(2) Transfers may be made from the State Board of Landscape
Architects Cash Fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the State Board of Landscape Architects Cash
Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(3) Warrants for the payment of expenses and compensation as
provided for in the Professional Landscape Architects Act shall be issued
by the Director of Administrative Services and paid by the State
Treasurer out of the State Board of Landscape Architects Cash Fund upon
presentation of vouchers regularly drawn by the chairperson of the board
and approved by the board. At no time shall the total amount of warrants
exceed the total amount of fees collected under the act and credited to
the fund.
Sec. 78. Section 81-1201.21, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1201.21 (1) There is hereby created the Job Training Cash Fund.
The fund shall be under the direction of the Department of Economic
Development. Money may be transferred to the fund pursuant to subdivision
-73-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
(1)(b)(iii) of section 48-621 and from the Cash Reserve Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. The department shall establish a subaccount
for all money transferred from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Job Training
Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2005.
(2) The money in the Job Training Cash Fund or the subaccount
established in subsection (1) of this section shall be used (a) to
provide reimbursements for job training activities, including employee
assessment, preemployment training, on-the-job training, training
equipment costs, and other reasonable costs related to helping industry
and business locate or expand in Nebraska, (b) to provide upgrade skills
training of the existing labor force necessary to adapt to new technology
or the introduction of new product lines, or (c) as provided in section
79-2308. The department shall give a preference to job training
activities carried out in whole or in part within an enterprise zone
designated pursuant to the Enterprise Zone Act or an opportunity zone
designated pursuant to the federal Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, Public Law
115-97.
(3) The department shall establish a subaccount within the fund to
provide training grants for training employees and potential employees of
businesses that (a) employ twenty-five or fewer employees on the
application date, (b) employ, or train for potential employment,
residents of rural areas of Nebraska, or (c) are located in or employ, or
train for potential employment, residents of high-poverty areas as
defined in section 81-1203. The department shall calculate the amount of
prior year investment income earnings accruing to the fund and allocate
such amount to the subaccount for training grants under this subsection.
The subaccount shall also be used as provided in the Teleworker Job
Creation Act. The department shall give a preference to training grants
for businesses located in whole or in part within an enterprise zone
designated pursuant to the Enterprise Zone Act.
(4) On April 5, 2018, any funds that were dedicated to carrying out
-74-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
sections 81-1210.01 to 81-1210.03 but were not yet expended shall be
transferred to the Intern Nebraska Cash Fund.
(5) Transfers may be made from the Job Training Cash Fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Job
Training Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 79. Section 81-1201.22, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-1201.22 (1) There is hereby created the Administrative Cash Fund
to be administered by the department. Revenue from the following sources
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund:
(a) Fees charged for the sale of department publications or
subscription to publications;
(b) Fees charged for the sale of Nebraska items promoting economic
development of the state;
(c) Deposits charged for the temporary use of Nebraska items
promoting economic development of the state;
(d) Fees charged for attendance and participation in department-
sponsored conferences, training sessions, and other special events;
(e) Money collected from nondepartment sources in connection with
cooperative funding of advertising, marketing, promotional, or consulting
activities; and
(f) Money received by the department in the form of gifts, grants,
reimbursements, or appropriations from any source intended to be used by
the department for carrying out the provisions of Chapter 81, article 12.
(2) Revenue from the fund may be expended for the following
purposes:
(a) Production and distribution costs of department publications;
(b) Purchase of items promoting economic development of the state
intended for sale;
-75-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
(c) Reimbursement of deposits collected for the temporary use of
promotional items;
(d) Payment of costs in connection with department-sponsored
conferences, training sessions, and other special events;
(e) Payment of costs of advertising, marketing, promotional, or
consulting activities in cooperative funding partnerships with
nondepartment organizations; and
(f) Payment of costs for which fund revenue has been received and
which are related to department activities in Chapter 81, article 12.
(3) Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Administrative Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 80. Section 81-1211, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1211 The Lead-Based Paint Hazard Control Cash Fund is created in
the Department of Economic Development. The fund shall receive transfers
from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund as authorized by the Legislature.
Except as otherwise provided in this section, the department shall use
the entirety of the fund to award a grant to a city of the metropolitan
class to carry out lead-based paint hazard control on owner-occupied
properties, contingent upon formal notification by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development that it intends to award a
grant to a city of the metropolitan class to carry out the federal
Residential Lead-Based Paint Hazard Reduction Act of 1992, 42 U.S.C.
4852, as such section existed on January 1, 2015. No more than fifteen
percent of the grant proceeds may be used for administrative expenses. It
is the intent of the Legislature that any grant awarded from the Lead-
Based Paint Hazard Control Cash Fund shall be applied to the
congressional district grant allocations as established under section
-76-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
58-708. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Lead-Based Paint Hazard
Control Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 81. Section 81-1213.02, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1213.02 The Economic Development Cash Fund is created. The
Department of Economic Development shall administer the fund to provide a
grant to a community college serving a city of the metropolitan class to
partner with a four-year public university serving a city of the
metropolitan class to offer microcredentials to support education
expansion, curricula development, and staff hires to meet demand for
microchip fabrication and microelectronics manufacturing in the state in
conjunction with the Creating Helpful Incentives to Produce
Semiconductors (CHIPS) for America Act, Public Law 116-283. The fund
shall consist of money transferred by the Legislature and gifts, grants,
or bequests from any source, including money remitted to the fund from
any other federal, state, public, and private sources. Transfers may be
made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the Economic Development Cash Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 82. Section 81-1216, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1216 The Customized Job Training Cash Fund is created. Funds in
the Customized Job Training Cash Fund shall be used for (1) general
administrative costs of awarding job training reimbursement grants under
the Customized Job Training Act, as such act existed prior to May 22,
2025, and (2) job training reimbursement grants. Transfers may be made
-77-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
Any money in the Customized Job Training Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 83. Section 81-1413.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-1413.01 There is hereby created the Nebraska Law Enforcement
Training Center Cash Fund. All receipts for tuition and fees paid to the
Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center shall be paid into the state
treasury and by the State Treasurer credited to the Nebraska Law
Enforcement Training Center Cash Fund. Such fund shall be used to defray
the expenses of the training center , except that transfers may be made
from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
Any money in the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 84. Section 81-1428, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1428 The Law Enforcement Improvement Fund is created and shall be
maintained by the State Treasurer as a cash fund. The fund shall consist
of revenue credited pursuant to section 81-1429 and investment income.
The fund shall be used for payment of administrative and operations
expenses of the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center and such other
expenses as budgeted by the Legislature for the improvement of law
enforcement , except that transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The Law Enforcement
Improvement Fund shall be administered by the director. Any money in the
fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
-78-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 85. Section 81-1558, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1558 There is hereby created within the state treasury a fund to
be known as the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Fund. The
proceeds of the fee imposed by sections 81-1559 to 81-1560.02, money
received by the department as gifts, donations, or contributions toward
the goals stated in section 81-1535, and money received by the department
for nonprofit activities concerning litter reduction and recycling,
including, but not limited to, honoraria, literature furnished by the
department, and funds realized as reimbursement for expenses in
conducting educational forums, shall be remitted to the State Treasurer
for credit to such fund to be used for the administration and enforcement
of the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act. Transfers may be made
from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
Any money in the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from
investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 86. Section 81-15,121, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-15,121 (1) A person shall not (a) maintain or use any tank for
the storage of regulated substances, (b) install any new tank, or (c)
permanently close a tank without first securing a permit from the State
Fire Marshal.
(2) A fee shall not be charged for a permit under subdivision (1)(a)
or (c) of this section. The fee for a permit for installation shall be
seventy-five dollars. The State Fire Marshal shall remit the fee to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Underground Storage Tank Fund.
(3) All owners of operating tanks, except those provided for in
-79-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
subsection (4) of this section, shall annually register each tank. All
registration permits shall expire on December 31 of the year for which
the permit was issued. The registration fee shall be no more than sixty
dollars per tank. The State Fire Marshal shall remit the fee to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Underground Storage Tank Fund. Such permits
shall contain the information specified in subsection (5) of this
section.
(4) In the case of tanks permanently abandoned on or after January
1, 1974, an annual permit shall not be required and an initial
registration permit shall be sufficient.
(5) The application for a registration permit shall be provided by
and filed with the State Fire Marshal's office and shall require, but not
be limited to, the following information:
(a) The date the tank was placed in or taken out of operation;
(b) The age of the tank;
(c) The size, type, and location of the tank; and
(d) The type of substances stored in the tank and the quantity of
such substances remaining in the tank if the tank has been permanently
closed.
(6) The registration permit fee collected pursuant to this section
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Underground
Storage Tank Fund which is hereby created as a cash fund. The fund shall
also consist of any money appropriated to the fund by the state. The fund
shall be administered by the State Fire Marshal to carry out the purposes
of the Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling
Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Underground Storage Tank
Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 87. Section 81-15,160, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
-80-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
amended to read:
81-15,160 (1) The Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fund is
created. The department shall deduct from the fund amounts sufficient to
reimburse itself for its costs of administration of the fund. The fund
shall be administered by the department. The fund shall consist of
proceeds from the fees imposed pursuant to the Waste Reduction and
Recycling Incentive Act.
(2) The fund may be used for purposes which include, but are not
limited to:
(a) Technical and financial assistance to political subdivisions for
creation of recycling systems and for modification of present recycling
systems;
(b) Recycling and waste reduction projects, including public
education, planning, and technical assistance;
(c) Market development for recyclable materials separated by
generators, including public education, planning, and technical
assistance;
(d) Capital assistance for establishing private and public
intermediate processing facilities for recyclable materials and
facilities using recyclable materials in new products;
(e) Programs which develop and implement composting of yard waste
and composting with sewage sludge;
(f) Technical assistance for waste reduction and waste exchange for
waste generators;
(g) Programs to assist communities and counties to develop and
implement household hazardous waste management programs;
(h) Capital assistance for establishing private and public
facilities to manufacture combustible waste products and to incinerate
combustible waste to generate and recover energy resources, except that
no disbursements shall be made under this section for scrap tire
processing related to tire-derived fuel;
-81-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
(i) Grants for reimbursement of costs to cities of the first class,
cities of the second class, villages, and counties of five thousand or
fewer population for the deconstruction of abandoned buildings. Eligible
deconstruction costs will be related to the recovery and processing of
recyclable or reusable material from the abandoned buildings; and
(j) Administrative costs of the department in fiscal years 2025-26
and 2026-27 to implement, administer, and enforce the Safe Battery
Collection and Recycling Act.
(3) Grants up to one million five hundred thousand dollars annually
shall be available until June 30, 2029, for new scrap tire projects only,
if acceptable scrap tire project applications are received. Eligible
categories of disbursement under section 81-15,161 may include, but are
not limited to:
(a) Reimbursement for the purchase of crumb rubber generated and
used in Nebraska, with disbursements not to exceed fifty percent of the
cost of the crumb rubber;
(b) Reimbursement for the purchase of tire-derived product which
utilizes a minimum of twenty-five percent recycled tire content, with
disbursements not to exceed twenty-five percent of the product's retail
cost;
(c) Participation in the capital costs of building, equipment, and
other capital improvement needs or startup costs for scrap tire
processing or manufacturing of tire-derived product, with disbursements
not to exceed fifty percent of such costs or five hundred thousand
dollars, whichever is less;
(d) Participation in the capital costs of building, equipment, or
other startup costs needed to establish collection sites or to collect
and transport scrap tires, with disbursements not to exceed fifty percent
of such costs;
(e) Cost-sharing for the manufacturing of tire-derived product, with
disbursements not to exceed twenty dollars per ton or two hundred fifty
-82-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
thousand dollars, whichever is less, to any person annually;
(f) Cost-sharing for the processing of scrap tires, with
disbursements not to exceed twenty dollars per ton or two hundred fifty
thousand dollars, whichever is less, to any person annually;
(g) Cost-sharing for the use of scrap tires for civil engineering
applications for specified projects, with disbursements not to exceed
twenty dollars per ton or two hundred fifty thousand dollars, whichever
is less, to any person annually;
(h) Disbursement to a political subdivision up to one hundred
percent of costs incurred in cleaning up scrap tire collection and
disposal sites; and
(i) Costs related to the study provided in section 81-15,159.01.
The director shall give preference to projects which utilize scrap
tires generated and used in Nebraska.
(4) Priority for grants made under section 81-15,161 shall be given
to grant proposals demonstrating a formal public/private partnership
except for grants awarded from fees collected under subsection (6) of
section 13-2042.
(5) Grants awarded from fees collected under subsection (6) of
section 13-2042 may be renewed for up to a five-year grant period. Such
applications shall include an updated integrated solid waste management
plan pursuant to section 13-2032. Annual disbursements are subject to
available funds and the grantee meeting established grant conditions.
Priority for such grants shall be given to grant proposals showing
regional participation and programs which address the first integrated
solid waste management hierarchy as stated in section 13-2018 which shall
include toxicity reduction. Disbursements for any one year shall not
exceed fifty percent of the total fees collected after rebates under
subsection (6) of section 13-2042 during that year.
(6) Any person who stores waste tires in violation of section
13-2033, which storage is the subject of abatement or cleanup, shall be
-83-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
liable to the State of Nebraska for the reimbursement of expenses of such
abatement or cleanup paid by the department.
(7) The department may receive gifts, bequests, and any other
contributions for deposit in the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive
Fund. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Waste Reduction and
Recycling Incentive Fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 88. Section 81-15,165, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,165 The Tax Commissioner shall deduct and withhold from the
fees collected pursuant to sections 81-15,159 to 81-15,165 a fee
sufficient to reimburse himself or herself for the actual cost of
collecting and administering such fees and shall credit such collection
fee to the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fees Collection Fund
which is hereby created. The Legislature shall appropriate money from the
fund to the Department of Revenue to cover the actual costs of the
department in administering the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive
Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Waste Reduction and
Recycling Incentive Fees Collection Fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 89. Section 81-15,180, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-15,180 The Superfund Cost Share Cash Fund is created. The
Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall remit grants and gifts
received by the department for purposes of providing cost share for
remediation of superfund sites to the State Treasurer for credit to the
fund. The department shall administer the Superfund Cost Share Cash Fund
-84-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
to pay for nonfederal costs, including costs for in-kind services,
required as cost share for remediation of superfund sites. Transfers may
be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the Superfund Cost Share Cash Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 90. Section 81-15,300, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-15,300 There is hereby created the Engineering Plan Review Cash
Fund which shall be used to pay the expenses of the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment related to engineering reviews of plans and
specifications, including those under subsection (3) of section 81-15,268
and subsection (2) of section 81-15,282. Transfers may be made from the
fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money
in the Engineering Plan Review Cash Fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 91. Section 81-1607.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-1607.01 The State Energy Cash Fund is hereby created. The fund
shall consist of funds received pursuant to section 57-705. The fund
shall be used for the administration of subdivisions (35) through (58) of
section 81-1504 and sections 81-1604 to 81-1607, for energy conservation
activities, and for providing technical assistance to communities in the
area of natural gas other than assistance regarding ownership of
regulated utilities , except that transfers may be made from the fund to
the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
State Energy Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The State Treasurer shall
-85-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
transfer any money in the State Energy Office Cash Fund to the State
Energy Cash Fund on July 1, 2019.
Sec. 92. Section 81-2004.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-2004.01 (1) The Carrier Enforcement Cash Fund is created. The
fund shall be established within the Nebraska State Patrol and
administered by the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety.
The fund shall consist of fund transfers made each fiscal year from the
Roads Operations Cash Fund as authorized by the Legislature through the
budget process.
(2) The Carrier Enforcement Cash Fund shall only be used to pay the
costs associated with the operation of the carrier enforcement division
of the patrol, except that (a) the Legislature may authorize fund
transfers each fiscal year through the budget process from the Carrier
Enforcement Cash Fund to the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System
Cash Fund to pay the carrier enforcement division's share of operations
costs of the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System and (b)
transfers may be made from the Carrier Enforcement Cash Fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
(3) Any money in the Carrier Enforcement Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 93. Section 81-2004.07, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-2004.07 The Nebraska State Patrol Vehicle Replacement Cash Fund
is created. The Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety of
the Nebraska State Patrol shall administer the fund. The fund shall be
used to purchase motor vehicles for the Nebraska State Patrol. Transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska State Patrol Vehicle Replacement
-86-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 94. Section 81-2004.08, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-2004.08 (1) The Nebraska Public Safety Communication System Cash
Fund is created. The fund shall be established within the Nebraska State
Patrol and administered by the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and
Public Safety. The fund shall consist of all revenue credited pursuant to
law, including any fund transfers authorized by the Legislature.
(2) The fund shall only be used to pay the patrol's direct costs
related to administering, operating, and maintaining the Nebraska Public
Safety Communication System, except that (a) any unobligated money in the
fund may first be used to reduce the patrol's General Fund costs to
operate the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System, and if
additional unobligated money in the fund exists, the Legislature may
transfer money from the fund to the State Fire Marshal and the Game and
Parks Commission to reduce the General Fund costs to operate the Nebraska
Public Safety Communication System , and (b) transfers may be made from
the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 95. Section 81-2105, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2105 There is hereby created the Electrical Division Fund. All
money received under the State Electrical Act shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the fund. Each member of the board shall be
reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties
pursuant to sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 to be paid out of the fund.
-87-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature.
Sec. 96. Section 81-3119, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3119 (1) The Health and Human Services Cash Fund is created and
shall consist of funds from contracts, grants, gifts, or fees. The fund
may also consist of transfers from the Nebraska Opioid Recovery Trust
Fund.
(2) Any money transferred from the Nebraska Opioid Recovery Trust
Fund shall be used for staff to carry out the Overdose Fatality Review
Teams Act, in accordance with the terms and conditions of the litigation
or settlement that is the source of the money. Any other money in the
Health and Human Services Cash Fund may be transferred to the General
Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
(3) Any money in the Health and Human Services Cash Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 97. Section 81-3432, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3432 The Engineers and Architects Regulation Fund is created. The
board shall receive and account for all money derived from the operation
of the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act and shall remit the money
to the State Treasurer for credit to the Engineers and Architects
Regulation Fund. All expenses certified by the board as properly and
necessarily incurred in the discharge of duties, including compensation
and administrative staff, and any expense incident to the administration
of the act relating to other states shall be paid out of the fund. Debt
repayments payable pursuant to section 81-3432.01 shall be paid out of
the fund. Warrants for the payment of expenses shall be issued by the
Director of Administrative Services and paid by the State Treasurer upon
-88-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
presentation of vouchers regularly drawn by the chairperson and secretary
of the board and approved by the board. At no time shall the total amount
of warrants exceed the total amount of the fees collected under the act
and to the credit of the fund. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Money in the Engineers and Architects Regulation Fund may
be transferred to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
Sec. 98. Section 81-3524, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3524 The Geologists Regulation Fund is created. The secretary of
the board shall receive and account for all money derived from the
operation of the Geologists Regulation Act. The board shall remit the
money to the State Treasurer for credit to the Geologists Regulation
Fund, which shall be continued from year to year and shall be drawn
against only as provided for in this section and, when reappropriated for
the succeeding biennium, shall not revert to the General Fund. All
expenses certified by the board as properly and necessarily incurred in
the discharge of duties, including compensation and administrative staff,
and any expense incident to the administration of the act relating to
other states, shall be paid out of the fund. Warrants for the payment of
expenses shall be issued by the Director of Administrative Services and
paid by the State Treasurer upon presentation of vouchers regularly drawn
by the chairperson and secretary of the board and approved by the board.
At no time shall the total amount of warrants exceed the total amount of
the fees collected under the act and to the credit of the fund. Transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the Geologists Regulation Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
-89-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Sec. 99. Section 81-3714, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3714 The State Visitors Promotion Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall be administered by the commission. The fund shall consist of
revenue deposited into the fund pursuant to section 81-3715 and money
donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions from public or private
entities. Funds made available by any department or agency of the United
States may also be credited to the fund if so directed by such department
or agency. The commission shall use the proceeds of the fund to generally
promote, encourage, and attract visitors to and within the State of
Nebraska, to erect and replace highway tourism markers, to enhance the
use of travel and tourism facilities within the state, to provide grants
to communities and organizations, and to contract with the Department of
Administrative Services to provide support services to the commission,
including, but not limited to, accounting and personnel functions. The
proceeds of the fund shall be in addition to funds appropriated to the
commission from the General Fund. Transfers may be made from the State
Visitors Promotion Cash Fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. The State Treasurer shall transfer one million dollars from
the State Visitors Promotion Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before
June 30, 2019, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services. Any money in the State Visitors Promotion Cash
Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment
earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the
General Fund.
Sec. 100. Section 82-108.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
82-108.02 All funds received by the Nebraska State Historical
-90-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
Society for services rendered shall be remitted to the State Treasurer
for credit to the Historical Society Fund which is hereby established.
Funds to the credit of the fund shall only be expended, as and when
appropriated by the Legislature, by the Nebraska State Historical Society
for the general purposes of such society, including, but not limited to,
preparation for historical events and educational projects , except that
transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature. Any money in the Historical Society Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 101. Section 82-139, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
82-139 The Support Nebraska History Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall consist of money credited to the fund under section 60-3,163.02 and
any other gifts, bequests, grants, or other contributions or donations to
the fund from public or private entities. The Nebraska State Historical
Society shall administer and distribute the Support Nebraska History Cash
Fund. The fund shall be expended to promote the history of Nebraska on
the Internet, to support history education for children in Nebraska, and
for costs directly related to the administration of the fund. Transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the Support Nebraska History Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 102. Section 83-913.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
83-913.01 (1) There is hereby created the Department of Correctional
Services Facility Cash Fund.
Except as otherwise provided, all money derived from any source in
-91-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
any facility under the supervision of the Department of Correctional
Services shall be remitted to the State Treasurer in accordance with the
policies and procedures established by the Director of Correctional
Services for credit to the fund. Transfers may be made from the fund to
the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Department of Correctional Services Facility Cash Fund available for
investment may be invested pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) All disbursements from the fund shall be made by the Director of
Administrative Services by warrants drawn on the fund only upon
certification of expenses by the chief executive officer of the
appropriate facility within the Department of Correctional Services and
upon presentation of proper vouchers for such expenses by the Director of
Correctional Services or his or her authorized agent.
Sec. 103. Section 84-409, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-409 There shall be paid to the State Treasurer, for each day the
State Surveyor is engaged in making any survey or in settling and
disposing of disputes and disagreements, as provided in section 84-410, a
per diem rate of compensation as determined by the Board of Educational
Lands and Funds for his or her services and the necessary expenses
incurred in making the same. All fees received for the services and
expenses of the State Surveyor or deputy surveyors shall be paid into the
state treasury and by the State Treasurer placed in a fund to be known as
Surveyors' Cash Fund, which fund shall be used in paying the salaries and
expenses of deputy surveyors, except as provided in section 84-407.01, in
making surveys and for making refunds on deposits. All fees and expenses
placed in the Surveyors' Cash Fund for the services and expenses of the
State Surveyor, after the payments from the cash fund are made as
hereinbefore provided, shall be transferred to the General Fund.
Transfers may be made from the Surveyors' Cash Fund to the General Fund
-92-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Surveyors' Cash
Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 104. Section 84-414, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-414 The State Surveyor, under the direction of the Board of
Educational Lands and Funds, shall receive and account for all money
derived from the operation of the survey record repository pursuant to
sections 84-412 and 84-413, and shall pay such money to the State
Treasurer, who shall credit it to the Survey Record Repository Fund which
is hereby created. When appropriated by the Legislature, this fund shall
be expended only for the purposes of sections 84-412 and 84-413 , except
that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. All money in the Survey Record Repository
Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 105. Section 84-618, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-618 (1) The Treasury Management Cash Fund is created. A pro rata
share of the budget appropriated for the treasury management functions of
the State Treasurer and for the administration of the achieving a better
life experience program as provided in sections 77-1401 to 77-1409 shall
be charged to the income of each fund held in invested cash, and such
charges shall be transferred to the Treasury Management Cash Fund. The
allocation of charges may be made by any method determined to be
reasonably related to actual costs incurred by the State Treasurer in
carrying out the treasury management functions under section 84-602 and
in carrying out the achieving a better life experience program as
provided in sections 77-1401 to 77-1409. Approval of the agencies,
-93-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
boards, and commissions administering these funds shall not be required.
(2) It is the intent of this section to have funds held in invested
cash be charged a pro rata share of such expenses when this is not
prohibited by statute or the Constitution of Nebraska.
(3) The Treasury Management Cash Fund shall be used for the treasury
management functions of the State Treasurer and for the administration of
the achieving a better life experience program as provided in sections
77-1401 to 77-1409. To the extent permitted by section 529A as defined in
section 77-1401, the fund may receive gifts for administration,
operation, and maintenance of a program established under sections
77-1403 to 77-1409.
(4) Transfers may be made from the Treasury Management Cash Fund to
the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the
Treasury Management Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(5) On or before July 5, 2019, or as soon thereafter as possible,
the State Treasurer shall transfer eighty-two thousand one hundred sixty-
seven dollars from the Treasury Management Cash Fund to the General Fund.
On or before July 1, 2020, the State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-
seven thousand six hundred eighty-two dollars from the Treasury
Management Cash Fund to the General Fund.
Sec. 106. Section 84-1227, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-1227 There is hereby established in the state treasury a special
fund to be known as the Records Management Cash Fund which, when
appropriated by the Legislature, shall be expended by the Secretary of
State for the purposes of providing records management services and
assistance to state and local agencies, for development and maintenance
of the portal for providing electronic access to public records or
electronic information and services, and for grants to a state or local
-94-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
agency as provided in subdivision (1)(j) of section 84-1204. All fees and
charges for the purpose of records management services and analysis
received by the Secretary of State from the local agencies shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to such fund. Transfers may be
made from the fund to the General Fund, the Secretary of State Cash
Fund , or the Election Administration Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the Records Management Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from
investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 107. Section 85-1419, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-1419 There is hereby created the Coordinating Commission for
Postsecondary Education Cash Fund. The fund shall contain money received
from application fees from out-of-state institutions of higher and
postsecondary education seeking authorization to offer courses and
programs in the State of Nebraska and from private colleges seeking
provisional accreditation and money received by the commission for
services rendered incident to the administration of its statutory or
contractual functions. The fund shall be expended for the administrative
costs of reviewing applications, publishing and duplicating reports,
coordinating studies, conducting conferences, and other related
activities as may be authorized by the Legislature or by contract ,
except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at
the direction of the Legislature. All such money received by the
commission shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Cash Fund. A report
on the receipts and expenditures from the fund shall be included as a
part of the operating budget request submitted to the Legislature and the
Governor. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
-95-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 108. Section 88-545.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
88-545.01 (1) The commission may enter into contracts with public or
private entities which provide a benefit for both parties for purposes of
performing audit or examination work. The commission shall conduct the
work as time permits and shall not allow the work to conflict with the
commission's primary responsibility of performing grain warehouse
examinations within the prescribed statutory time.
(2) Fees from audit or examination contracts shall be remitted by
the commission to the State Treasurer for credit to the Grain Warehouse
Auditing Fund which is created. The fund shall be available to the
commission to buy material and equipment for performing audits and
examinations or to offset the cost of performing audits and examinations.
Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature. Any money in the Grain Warehouse Auditing Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 109. Section 88-552, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
88-552 There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be
known as the Nebraska Grain Warehouse Surveillance Cash Fund. Such fund
shall be used solely for disbursing funds and receiving reimbursement for
services performed by the commission in the suspension or termination of
a warehouse operation , except that transfers may be made from the fund
to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. All money
received by the commission for such services shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Grain Warehouse Surveillance
Cash Fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
-96-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 110. Section 89-1,100, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
89-1,100 The director shall collect registration, permit,
laboratory, test, administrative, and inspection fees and money required
to be reimbursed as provided for in the Weights and Measures Act and
shall remit such funds to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall
credit such funds to the Weights and Measures Administrative Fund, which
fund is hereby created. All fees and reimbursements collected pursuant to
the act and credited to the fund shall be appropriated to the uses of the
department to aid in defraying the expenses of administering the act ,
except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at
the direction of the Legislature. Any unexpended balance in the Weights
and Measures Administrative Fund at the close of any biennium shall, when
reappropriated, be available for the uses and purposes of the fund for
the succeeding biennium. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act. The registration, permit, laboratory, test, administrative, and
inspection fees and money required to be reimbursed as provided for in
the Weights and Measures Act shall constitute a lien on the weighing and
measuring devices or standards required to be registered or approved for
use in this state until such fees and reimbursements are paid. The
director may sue for such fees and reimbursements and may seek to
foreclose on any lien in the name of the state. The county attorney of
the county in which the device is located or the Attorney General's
office shall, upon the request of the director, take appropriate action
to establish and foreclose on any such lien.
Sec. 111. Original sections 1-111, 2-1503.01, 2-1587, 2-15,122,
2-5106, 28-429, 29-3921, 46-1121, 47-632, 49-708, 50-114.05, 50-437,
-97-

LB772 LB772
2026 2026
54-857, 54-2428, 55-131, 60-3,218, 60-1409, 66-1842, 70-1020, 71-222.02,
71-4732, 71-8612, 72-816, 75-159, 76-549, 77-1342, 77-5031, 81-201.05,
81-2,147.11, 81-2,162.27, 81-2,291, 81-406, 81-528, 81-530, 81-5,153,
81-5,180, 81-829.33, 81-8,110.07, 81-8,129.01, 81-8,194, 81-1201.22,
81-1413.01, 81-1428, 81-15,165, 81-1607.01, 81-2004.01, 81-2105, 81-3119,
81-3432, 81-3524, 81-3714, 82-108.02, 83-913.01, 84-409, 84-414, 84-618,
84-1227, 85-1419, 88-545.01, 88-552, and 89-1,100, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, sections 8-1120, 38-157, 44-116, 53-117.06,
59-1608.04, 66-739, 66-1521, and 71-5661, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and sections 2-1577, 8-604, 9-1,101, 9-1107, 13-2610,
37-351, 46-1403, 48-1,116, 49-14,140, 50-501, 60-3,201, 60-1505, 60-1513,
61-210, 61-224, 69-1317, 71-5328, 72-2211, 75-1101, 76-3219, 77-3,110,
77-2911, 77-4025, 77-4310.03, 77-5601, 79-1064, 81-179, 81-302, 81-407,
81-1201.21, 81-1211, 81-1213.02, 81-1216, 81-1558, 81-15,121, 81-15,160,
81-15,180, 81-15,300, 81-2004.07, 81-2004.08, and 82-139, Revised
Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-98-